POLITICS 

AS 

A VOCATION 

MAX WEBER 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



BY 



MAX WEBER 



REPRINTED FROM MAX WEBER: ESSAYS IN SOCIOLOGY 
TRANSLATED, EDITED, AND WITH AN INTRODUCTION BY 
H. H. GERTH and C. WRIGHT MILLS 




NEW YORK 
OXFORD UNIVERSITY PRESS 

1946 

inoulin digital editions 




2014 



Politics as a Vocation 



('Politik als Beruf,' Gesammelte Politische Schriften (Miinchen, 1921), 
pp. c396-4>50. Originally a speech at Munich University, 1918, published 
in 1919 by Duncker & Humblot, Munich.) 

THIS lecture, which I give at your request, will necessarily disap- 
point you in a numher of ways. You will naturally expect me to take 
a position on actual prohlems of tire day. But that will be the case 
only in a purely formal way and toward tire end, when I shall raise 
certain questions concerning tire significance of political action in 
the whole way of life. In today's lecture, all questions that refer to 
what policy and what content one should give one's political activity 
must be eliminated. For such questions have nothing to do with the 
general question of what politics as a vocation means and what it can 
mean. Now to our subject matter. 

What do we understand by politics? The concept is extremely 
broad and comprises airy kind of independent leadership in action. 
One speaks of tire currency policy of tire banks, of tire discounting 
policy of tire Reichsbank, of tire strike policy of a trade union; one 
may speak of tire educational policy of a municipality or a township, 
of tire policy of tire president of a voluntary association, and, finally, 
even of tire policy of a prudent wife who seeks to guide her hus- 
band. Tonight, our reflections are, of course, not based upon such a 
broad concept. We wish to understand by politics only tire leader- 
ship, or tire influencing of tire leadership, of a political association, 
hence today, of a state. 

But what is a 'political' association from tire sociological point of 
view? What is a 'state'? Sociologically, the state cannot be defined in 
terms of its ends. There is scarcely any task that some political asso- 
ciation has not taken in hand, and there is no task that one could say 
has always been exclusive and peculiar to those associations which 
are designated as political ones: today tire state, or historically, those 
associations which have been tire predecessors of tire modern state. 
Ultimately, one can define tire modern state sociologically only in 
terms of tire specific means peculiar to it, as to every political associ- 
ation, namely, the use of physical force. 

'Every state is founded on force,' said Trotsky at Brest-Litovsk. 
That is indeed right. If no social institutions existed which knew tire 
use of violence, then tire concept of 'state' would be eliminated, and 
a condition would emerge that could be designated as 'anarchy,' in 
the specific sense of this word. Of course, force is certainly not the 
normal or tire only means of tire state— nobody says that— but force is 
a means specific to tire state. Today tire relation between tire state 
and violence is an especially intimate one. In the past, the most va- 
ried institutions— beginning with tire sib— have known the use of 
physical force as quite normal. Today, however, we have to say that 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



a state is a human community that (successfully) claims the monopo- 
ly of the legitimate use of physical force within a given territory. 
Note that 'territory' is one of the characteristics of the state. Specifi- 
cally, at the present time, the right to use physical force is ascrihed to 
other institutions or to individuals only to the extent to which the 
state permits it. The state is considered the sole source of the 'right' 
to use violence. Hence, 'politics' for us means striving to share pow- 
er or striving to influence the distribution of power, either among 
states or among groups within a state. 

This corresponds essentially to ordinary usage. When a question 
is said to be a 'political' question, when a cabinet minister or an offi- 
cial is said to he a 'political' official, or when a decision is said to he 
'politically' determined, what is always meant is that interests in the 
distribution, maintenance, or transfer of power are decisive for ans- 
wering die questions and determining the decision or the official's 
sphere of activity. He who is active in politics strives for power either 
as a means in serving other aims, ideal or egoistic, or as 'power for 
power's sake,' that is, in order to enjoy the prestige-feeling that pow- 
er gives. 

Like the political institutions historically preceding it, the state is 
a relation of men dominating men, a relation supported by means of 
legitimate (i.e. considered to be legitimate) violence. If the state is to 
exist, die dominated must obey die authority claimed by die powers 
that be. When and why do men obey? Upon what inner justifica- 
tions and upon what external means does this domination rest? 

To begin with, in principle, there are three inner justifications, 
hence basic legitimations of domination. 

First, die authority of die 'eternal yesterday,' i.e. of the mores 
sanctified through die unimaginably ancient recognition and habitual 
orientation to conform. This is 'traditional' domination exercised by 
the patriarch and die patrimonial prince of yore. 

There is die authority of tire extraordinary and personal gift of 
grace (charisma), the absolutely personal devotion and personal con- 
fidence in revelation, heroism, or other qualities of individual lea- 
dership. This is 'charismatic' domination, as exercised by tire 
prophet or— in tire field of politics— by tire elected war lord, tire ple- 
biscitarian ruler, tire great demagogue, or tire political party leader. 

Finally, there is domination by virtue of 'legality,' by virtue of tire 
belief in the validity of legal statute and functional 'competence' 
based on rationally created rules. In this case, obedience is expected 
in discharging statutory obligations. This is domination as exercised 
by the modern 'servant of tire state' and by all those bearers of pow- 
er who in this respect resemble him. 

It is understood that, in reality, obedience is determined by high- 
ly robust motives of fear and hope— fear of tire vengeance of magical 
powers or of tire power-holder, hope for reward in this world or in 
tire beyond— and besides all this, by interests of tire most varied sort. 



4 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



Of this we shall speak presently. However, in asking for the 'legiti- 
mations' of this ohedience, one meets with these three 'pure' types: 
'traditional,' 'charismatic,' and 'legal.' 

These conceptions of legitimacy and their inner justifications are 
of very great significance for the structure of domination. To be 
sure, the pure types are rarely found in reality. But today we cannot 
deal with the highly complex variants, transitions, and combinations 
of these pure types, which problems belong to 'political science.' 
Here we are interested above all in the second of these types: domi- 
nation by virtue of the devotion of those who obey the purely per- 
sonal 'charisma' of the 'leader.' For this is the root of the idea of a 
calling in its highest expression. 

Devotion to the charisma of the prophet, or the leader in war, or 
to the great demagogue in the ecclesia or in parliament, means that 
the leader is personally recognized as the innerly 'called' leader of 
men. Men do not obey him by virtue of tradition or statute, but be- 
cause they believe in him. If he is more than a narrow and vain ups- 
tart of die moment, the leader lives for his cause and 'strives for his 
work." The devotion of his disciples, his followers, his personal par- 
ty friends is oriented to his person and to its qualities. 

Charismatic leadership has emerged in all places and in all his- 
torical epochs. Most importantly in the past, it has emerged in the 
two figures of the magician and the prophet on the one hand, and in 
the elected war lord, the gang leader and condotierre on the other 
hand. Political leadership in the form of the free 'demagogue' who 
grew from the soil of the city state is of greater concern to us; like 
the city state, the demagogue is peculiar to the Occident and espe- 
cially to Mediterranean culture. Furthermore, political leadership in 
the form of the parliamentary 'party leader' has grown on the soil of 
the constitutional state, which is also indigenous only to the Occi- 
dent. 

These politicians by virtue of a 'calling,' in the most genuine 
sense of the word, are of course nowhere the only decisive figures in 
the crosscurrents of the political struggle for power. The sort of aux- 
iliary means that are at their disposal is also highly decisive. How do 
the politically dominant powers manage to maintain their domina- 
tion? The question pertains to any kind of domination, hence also 
to political domination in all its forms, traditional as well as legal and 
charismatic. 

Organized domination, which calls for continuous administra- 
tion, requires that human conduct be conditioned to obedience to- 
wards those masters who claim to be the bearers of legitimate pow- 
er. On the other hand, by virtue of this obedience, organized domi- 
nation requires the control of those material goods which in a given 
case are necessary for the use of physical violence. Thus, organized 
domination requires control of the personal executive staff and the 
material implements of administration. 



5 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



The administrative staff, which externally represents the organi- 
zation of political domination, is, of course, like any other organiza- 
tion, hound by obedience to the power-holder and not alone by the 
concept of legitimacy, of which we have just spoken. There are two 
other means, both of which appeal to personal interests: material 
reward and social honor. The fiefs of vassals, the prebends of patri- 
monial officials, tire salaries of modern civil servants, tire honor of 
knights, tire privileges of estates, and tire honor of tire civil servant 
comprise their respective wages. The fear of losing them is tire final 
and decisive basis for solidarity between tire executive staff and tire 
power-holder. There is honor and booty for tire followers in war; for 
the demagogue's following, there are 'spoils'— that is, exploitation of 
the dominated through the monopolization of office— and there are 
politically determined profits and premiums of vanity. All of these 
rewards are also derived from the domination exercised by a cha- 
rismatic leader. 

To maintain a dominion by force, certain material goods are re- 
quired, just as with an economic organization. All states may be clas- 
sified according to whether they rest on tire principle that tire staff of 
men themselves own tire administrative means, or whether tire staff 
is 'separated' from these means of administration. This distinction 
holds in tire same sense in which today we say that tire salaried em- 
ployee and tire proletarian in tire capitalistic enterprise are 'sepa- 
rated' from tire material means of production. The power-holder 
must be able to count on tire obedience of tire staff members, offi- 
cials, or whoever else they may be. The administrative means may 
consist of money, building, war material, vehicles, horses, or what- 
not. The question is whether or not the power-holder himself di- 
rects and organizes tire administration while delegating executive 
power to personal servants, hired officials, or personal favorites and 
confidants, who are non-owners, i.e. who do not use the material 
means of administration in their own right but are directed by the 
lord. The distinction runs through all administrative organizations of 
tire past. 

These political associations in which the material means of ad- 
ministration are autonomously controlled, wholly or partly, by the 
dependent administrative staff may be called associations organized 
in 'estates' The vassal in the feudal association, for instance, paid 
out of his own pocket for the administration and judicature of tire 
district enfeoffed to him. He supplied his own equipment and pro- 
visions for war, and his subvassals did likewise. Of course, this had 
consequences for tire lord's position of power, which only rested 
upon a relation of personal faith and upon tire fact that tire legitima- 
cy of his possession of the fief and tire social honor of tire vassal 
were derived from tire overlord. 

However, everywhere, reaching back to tire earliest political 
formations, we also find the lord himself directing tire administra- 



6 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



tion. He seeks to take the administration into his own hands by hav- 
ing men personally dependent upon him: slaves, household officials, 
attendants, personal 'favorites,' and prebendaries enfeoffed in kind 
or in money from his magazines. He seeks to defray the expenses 
from his own pocket, from the revenues of his patrimonium; and he 
seeks to create an army which is dependent upon him personally 
because it is equipped and provisioned out of his granaries, maga- 
zines, and armories. In the association of 'estates,' die lord rules 
witii die aid of an autonomous 'aristocracy' and hence shares his 
domination witii it; die lord who personally administers is supported 
eidier by members of his household or by plebeians. These are 
propertyless strata having no social honor of dieir own; materially, 
diey are completely chained to him and are not backed up by any 
competing power of dieir own. All forms of patriarchal and patri- 
monial domination, Sultanist despotism, and bureaucratic states be- 
long to diis latter type. The bureaucratic state order is especially im- 
portant; in its most rational development, it is precisely characteristic 
of die modern state. 

Everywhere the development of the modern state is initiated 
dirough die action of die prince. He paves the way for die expropri- 
ation of the autonomous and 'private' bearers of executive power 
who stand beside him, of diose who in their own right possess the 
means of administration, warfare, and financial organization, as well 
as politically usable goods of all sorts. The whole process is a com- 
plete parallel to die development of the capitalist enterprise dirough 
gradual expropriation of the independent producers. In die end, the 
modern state controls die total means of political organization, 
which actually come togedier under a single head. No single official 
personally owns die money he pays out, or die buildings, stores, 
tools, and war machines he controls. In die contemporary 'state'— 
and diis is essential for the concept of state— die 'separation' of die 
administrative staff, of die administrative officials, and of die work- 
ers from die material means of administrative organization is com- 
pleted. Here die most modern development begins, and we see widi 
our own eyes the attempt to inaugurate die expropriation of diis ex- 
propriator of die political means, and therewidi of political power. 

The revolution [of Germany, 1918] has accomplished, at least in 
so far as leaders have taken die place of die statutory audiorities, this 
much: die leaders, dirough usurpation or election, have attained 
control over die political staff and the apparatus of material goods; 
and diey deduce dieir legitimacy— no matter widi what right— from 
the will of the governed. Whedier the leaders, on die basis of diis at 
least apparent success, can rightfully entertain die hope of also carry- 
ing dirough die expropriation within die capitalist enterprises is a 
different question. The direction of capitalist enterprises, despite far- 
reaching analogies, follows quite different laws than diose of political 
administration. 



7 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



Today we do not take a stand on diis question. I state only die 
purely conceptual aspect for our consideration: die modern state is a 
compulsory association which organizes domination. It has heen 
successful in seeking to monopolize die legitimate use of physical 
force as a means of domination widrin a territory. To this end die 
state has comhined die material means of organization in die hands 
of its leaders, and it has expropriated all autonomous functionaries 
of estates who formerly controlled diese means in dieir own right. 
The state has taken dieir positions and now stands in die top place. 

During diis process of political expropriation, which has oc- 
curred witii varying success in all countries on eardi, 'professional 
politicians' in another sense have emerged. They arose first in the 
service of a prince. They have been men who, unlike die charismat- 
ic leader, have not wished to be lords themselves, but who have en- 
tered die sendee of political lords. In the struggle of expropriation, 
they placed themselves at die princes' disposal and by managing the 
princes' politics they earned, on die one hand, a living and, on the 
other hand, an ideal content of life. Again, it is only in die Occident 
diat we find diis kind of professional politician in die service of 
powers other than the princes. In the past, they have been the most 
important power instrument of the prince and his instrument of po- 
litical expropriation. 

Before discussing 'professional politicians' in detail, let us clarify 
in all its aspects the state of affairs dieir existence presents. Politics, 
just as economic pursuits, may be a man's avocation or his vocation. 
One may engage in politics, and hence seek to influence the distri- 
bution of power within and between political structures, as an 'occa- 
sional' politician. We are all 'occasional' politicians when we cast 
our ballot or consummate a similar expression of intention, such as 
applauding or protesting in a 'political' meeting, or delivering a 'po- 
litical' speech, etc. The whole relation of many people to politics is 
restricted to this. Politics as an avocation is today practiced by all 
diose party agents and heads of voluntary political associations who, 
as a rule, are politically active only in case of need and for whom 
politics is, neither materially nor ideally, 'dieir life' in die first place. 
The same holds for diose members of state counsels and similar 
deliberative bodies that function only when summoned. It also holds 
for radier broad strata of our members of parliament who are politi- 
cally active only during sessions. In die past, such strata were found 
especially among die estates. Proprietors of military implements in 
dieir own right, or proprietors of goods important for the adminis- 
tration, or proprietors of personal prerogatives may be called 'es- 
tates.' A large portion of them were far from giving dieir lives wholly, 
or merely preferentially, or more than occasionally, to die service of 
politics. Rather, diey exploited dieir prerogatives in die interest of 
gaining rent or even profits; and diey became active in die service of 
political associations only when die overlord of dieir status-equals 



8 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



especially demanded it. It was not different in the case of some of 
the auxiliary forces which the prince drew into the struggle for the 
creation of a political organization to be exclusively at his disposal. 
This was the nature of die Rate von Hans aus [councilors] and, still 
further back, of a considerable part of the councilors assembling in 
the 'Curia' and other deliberating bodies of the princes. But these 
merely occasional auxiliary forces engaging in politics on the side 
were naturally not sufficient for the prince. Of necessity, the prince 
sought to create a staff of helpers dedicated wholly and exclusively to 
serving him, hence making this their major vocation. The structure 
of the emerging dynastic political organization, and not only this but 
the whole articulation of the culture, depended to a considerable 
degree upon the question of where the prince recruited agents. 

A staff was also necessary for those political associations whose 
members constituted themselves politically as (so-called) 'free' 
communes under the complete abolition or the far-going restriction 
of princely power. 

They were 'free' not in the sense of freedom from domination 
by force, but in the sense that princely power legitimized by tradition 
(mostly religiously sanctified) as tire exclusive source of all authority 
was absent. These communities have their historical home in the 
Occident. Their nucleus was the city as a body politic, tire form in 
which the city first emerged in the Mediterranean culture area. In all 
these cases, what did the politicians who made politics their major 
vocation look like? 

There are two ways of making politics one's vocation: Either one 
lives 'for' politics or one lives 'off politics. By no means is this con- 
trast an exclusive one. The rule is, rather, that man does both, at 
least in thought, and certainly he also does both in practice. He who 
lives 'for' politics makes politics his life, in an internal sense. Either 
he enjoys the naked possession of the power he exerts, or he nou- 
rishes his inner balance and self-feeling by tire consciousness that his 
life has meaning in the service of a 'cause.' In this internal sense, 
every sincere man who lives for a cause also lives off this cause. The 
distinction hence refers to a much more substantial aspect of tire 
matter, namely, to tire economic. He who strives to make politics a 
permanent source of income lives 'off politics as a vocation, whe- 
reas he who does not do this lives 'for' politics. Under the domin- 
ance of the private property order, some— if you wish— very trivial 
preconditions must exist in order for a person to be able to live 'for' 
politics in this economic sense. Under normal conditions, the politi- 
cian must be economically independent of the income politics can 
bring him. This means, quite simply, that the politician must be 
wealthy or must have a personal position in life which yields a suffi- 
cient income. 

This is the case, at least in normal circumstances. The war lord's 
following is just as little concerned about the conditions of a normal 



9 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



economy as is die street crowd following of die revolutionary hero. 
Bodi live off booty, plunder, confiscations, contributions, and die 
imposition of worthless and compulsory means of tender, which in 
essence amounts to die same tiling. But necessarily, diese are ex- 
traordinary phenomena. In everyday economic life, only some 
wealdi serves die purpose of making a man economically indepen- 
dent. Yet diis alone does not suffice. The professional politician 
must also be economically 'dispensable,' diat is, his income must 
not depend upon the fact that he constandy and personally places 
his ability and diinking entirely, or at least by far predominandy, in 
die service of economic acquisition. In die most unconditional way, 
the rentier is dispensable in this sense. Hence, he is a man who 
receives completely unearned income. He may be die territorial 
lord of die past or die large landowner and aristocrat of die present 
who receives ground rent. In Antiquity and die Middle Ages they 
who received slave or serf rents or in modern times rents from 
shares or bonds or similar sources— these are rentiers. 

Neidier die worker nor— and this has to be noted well— die entre- 
preneur, especially the modern, large-scale entrepreneur, is eco- 
nomically dispensable in this sense. For it is precisely the entrepre- 
neur who is tied to his enterprise and is dierefore not dispensable. 
This holds for die entrepreneur in industry far more dian for the 
entrepreneur in agriculture, considering die seasonal character of 
agriculture. In die main, it is very difficult for the entrepreneur to be 
represented in his enterprise by someone else, even temporarily. He 
is as littie dispensable as is die medical doctor, and die more emi- 
nent and busy he is die less dispensable he is. For purely organiza- 
tional reasons, it is easier for die lawyer to be dispensable; and 
dierefore the lawyer has played an incomparably greater, and often 
even a dominant, role as a professional politician. We shall not con- 
tinue in diis classification; rather let us clarify some of its ramifica- 
tions. 

The leadership of a state or of a party by men who (in the eco- 
nomic sense of die word) live exclusively for politics and not off pol- 
itics means necessarily a 'plutocratic' recruitment of die leading po- 
litical strata. To be sure, this does not mean that such plutocratic 
leadership signifies at die same time that the politically dominant 
strata will not also seek to live 'off politics, and hence diat die do- 
minant stratum will not usually exploit dieir political domination in 
their own economic interest. All that is unquestionable, of course. 
There has never been such a stratum that has not somehow lived 
'off politics. Only diis is meant: diat the professional politician need 
not seek remuneration direcdy for his political work, whereas every 
politician without means must absolutely claim diis. On the other 
hand, we do not mean to say diat the propertyless politician will 
pursue private economic advantages dirough politics, exclusively, or 
even predominandy. Nor do we mean diat he will not diink, in the 



10 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



first place, of 'the subject matter.' Nothing would be more incorrect. 
According to all experience, a care for the economic 'security' of his 
existence is consciously or unconsciously a cardinal point in the 
whole life orientation of the wealthy man. A quite reckless and un- 
reserved political idealism is found if not exclusively at least predo- 
minantly among those strata who by virtue of their propertylessness 
stand entirely outside of the strata who are interested in maintaining 
the economic order of a given society. This holds especially for ex- 
traordinary and hence revolutionary epochs. A non-plutocratic re- 
cruitment of interested politicians, of leadership and following, is 
geared to the self-understood precondition that regular and reliable 
income will accrue to those who manage politics. 

Either politics can be conducted 'honorifically' and then, as one 
usually says, by 'independent,' that is, by wealthy, men, and especial- 
ly by rentiers. Or, political leadership is made accessible to property- 
less men who must then be rewarded. The professional politician 
who lives 'off politics may be a pure 'prebendary' or a salaried 'offi- 
cial.' Then the politician receives either income from fees and per- 
quisites for specific services— tips and bribes are only an irregular 
and formally illegal variant of this category of income— or a fixed in- 
come in kind, a money salary, or both. He may assume the charac- 
ter of an 'entrepreneur,' like the condottiere or the holder of a 
farmed-out or purchased office, or like the American boss who con- 
siders his costs a capital investment which he brings to fruition 
through exploitation of his influence. Again, he may receive a fixed 
wage, like a journalist, a party secretary, a modern cabinet minister, 
or a political official. Feudal fiefs, land grants, and prebends of all 
sorts have been typical, in the past. With the development of the 
money economy, perquisites and prebends especially are the typical 
rewards for the following of princes, victorious conquerors, or suc- 
cessful party chiefs. For loyal sendees today, party leaders give offic- 
es of all sorts— in parties, newspapers, co-operative societies, health 
insurance, municipalities, as well as in the state. All party struggles 
are struggles for the patronage of office, as well as struggles for ob- 
jective goals. 

In Germany, all struggles between the proponents of local and 
of central government are focused upon the question of which pow- 
ers shall control the patronage of office, whether they are of Berlin, 
Munich, Karlsruhe, or Dresden. Setbacks in-participating in offices 
are felt more severely by parties than is action against their objective 
goals. In France, a turnover of prefects because of party politics has 
always been considered a greater transformation and has always 
caused a greater uproar than a modification in the government's 
program— the latter almost having the significance of mere verbiage. 
Some parties, especially those in America since the disappearance 
of the old conflicts concerning the interpretation of the constitution, 
have become pure patronage parties handing out jobs and changing 



11 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



their material program according to die chances of grabbing votes. 

In Spain, up to recent years, the two great parties, in a conven- 
tionally fixed manner, took turns in office by means of 'elections,' 
fabricated from above, in order to provide their followers with offic- 
es. In die Spanish colonial territories, in die so-called 'elections,' as 
well as in die so-called 'revolutions,' what was at stake was always die 
state bread-basket from which die victors wished to be fed. 

In Switzerland, die parties peacefully divided die offices among 
themselves proportionately, and some of our 'revolutionary' consti- 
tutional drafts, for instance die first draft of die Badenian constitu- 
tion, sought to extend diis system to ministerial positions. Thus, the 
state and state offices were considered as pure institutions for the 
provision of spoilsmen. 

Above all, die Cadiolic Center party was endiusiastically for diis 
draft. In Badenia, the part}', as part of die party platform, made the 
distribution of offices proportional to confessions and hence widiout 
regard to achievement. This tendency becomes stronger for all par- 
ties when the number of offices increase as a result of general bu- 
reaucratization and when die demand for offices increases because 
diey represent specifically secure livelihoods. For dieir followings, 
the parties become more and more a means to die end of being 
provided for in this manner. 

The development of modern officialdom into a highly qualified, 
professional labor force, specialized in expertness dirough long 
years of preparatory training, stands opposed to all these arrange- 
ments. Modern bureaucracy in die interest of integrity has devel- 
oped a high sense of status honor; widiout diis sense die danger of 
an awful corruption and a vulgar Philistinism direatens fatally. And 
widiout such integrity, even the purely technical functions of the 
state apparatus would be endangered. The significance of die state 
apparatus for the economy has been steadily rising, especially widi 
increasing socialization, and its significance will be furdier aug- 
mented. 

In die United States, amateur administration dirough booty poli- 
ticians in accordance widi die outcome of presidential elections re- 
sulted in die exchange of hundreds of diousands of officials, even 
down to die mail carrier. The administration knew nodiing of the 
professional civil-servant-for-life, but diis amateur administration has 
long since been punctured by die Civil Sendee Reform. Purely tech- 
nical, irrefrageable needs of the administration have determined diis 
development. 

In Europe, expert officialdom, based on die division of labor, 
has emerged in a gradual development of half a diousand years. The 
Italian cities and seigniories were die beginning, among die monar- 
chies, and die states of the Norman conquerors. But the decisive 
step was taken in connection widi die administration of die finances 
of die prince. Widi the administrative reforms of Emperor Max, it 



12 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



can be seen how hard it was for the officials to depose successfully 
of the prince in this field, even under the pressure of extreme emer- 
gency and of Turkish rule. The sphere of finance could afford least 
of all a ruler's dilettantism— a ruler who at drat time was still above all 
a knight. The development of war technique called forth die expert 
and specialized officer; die differentiation of legal procedure called 
fordi die trained jurist. In diese diree areas— finance, war, and law- 
expert officialdom in die more advanced states was definitely trium- 
phant during die sixteenth century. Widi die ascendancy of princely 
absolutism over the estates, there was simultaneously a gradual abdi- 
cation of die prince's autocratic rule in favor of an expert official- 
dom. These very officials had only facilitated the prince's victory 
over the estates. 

The development of die 'leading politicians' was realized along 
widi die ascendancy of the specially trained officialdom, even if in 
far less noticeable transitions. Of course, such really decisive advis- 
ers of die princes have existed at all times and all over die world. In 
die Orient, die need for relieving die Sultan as far as possible from 
personal responsibility for the success of the government has created 
the typical figure of die 'Grand Vizier.' In die Occident, influenced 
above all by die reports of die Venetian legates, diplomacy first be- 
came a consciously cultivated art in die age of Charles V, in Machia- 
velli's time. The reports of die Venetian legates were read widi pas- 
sionate zeal in expert diplomatic circles. The adepts of diis art, who 
were in the main educated humanistically, treated one anodier as 
trained initiates, similar to die humanist Chinese statesmen in die 
last period of die warring states. The necessity of a formally unified 
guidance of the whole policy, including diat of home affairs, by a 
leading statesman finally and compellingly arose only dirough consti- 
tutional development. Of course, individual personalities, such as 
advisers of die princes, or radier, in fact, leaders, had again and 
again existed before dien. But die organization of administrative 
agencies even in the most advanced states first proceeded along oth- 
er avenues. Top collegial administrative agencies had emerged. In 
dieory, and to a gradually decreasing extent in fact, they met under 
die personal chairmanship of die prince who rendered die decision. 
This collegial system led to memoranda, counter-memoranda, and 
reasoned votes of die majority and die minority. In addition to the 
official and highest audiorities, die prince surrounded himself with 
purely personal confidants— die 'cabinet'— and dirough diem ren- 
dered his decisions, after considering the resolutions of die state 
counsel, or whatever else the highest state agency was called. The 
prince, coming more and more into die position of a dilettante, 
sought to extricate himself from die unavoidably increasing weight of 
the experdy trained officials dirough die collegial system and the 
cabinet. He sought to retain die highest leadership in his own hands. 
This latent struggle between expert officialdom and autocratic rule 



13 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



existed everywhere. Only in die face of parliaments and die power 
aspirations of party leaders did die situation change. Very different 
conditions led to die externally identical result, diough to he sure 
widi certain differences. Wherever die dynasties retained actual 
power in their hands— as was especially die case in Germany— die 
interests of die prince were joined widi those of officialdom against 
parliament and its claims for power. The officials were also interest- 
ed in having leading positions, tiiat is, ministerial positions, occupied 
hy dieir own ranks, dius making diese positions an object of die offi- 
cial career. The monarch, on his part, was interested in being able to 
appoint die ministers from die ranks of devoted officials according 
to his own discretion. Bodi parties, however, were interested in see- 
ing die political leadership confront parliament in a unified and so- 
lidary fashion, and hence in seeing die collegial system replaced by a 
single cabinet head. Furdiermore, in order to be removed in a pure- 
ly formal way from the struggle of parties and from party attacks, the 
monarch needed a single personality to cover him and to assume 
responsibility, tiiat is, to answer to parliament and to negotiate widi 
die parties. All diese interests worked together and in die same di- 
rection: a minister emerged to direct die officialdom in a unified 
way. 

Where parliament gained supremacy over die monarch— as in 
England— the development of parliamentary power worked even 
more strongly in die direction of a unification of the state apparatus. 
In England, die 'cabinet,' widi die single head of Parliament as its 
'leader,' developed as a committee of die party which at die time 
controlled die majority. This party power was ignored by official law 
but, in fact, it alone was politically decisive. The official collegial bo- 
dies as such were not organs of die actual ruling power, the party, 
and hence could not be die bearers of real government. The ruling 
party required an ever-ready organization composed only of its ac- 
tually leading men, who would confidentially discuss matters in or- 
der to maintain power widiin and be capable of engaging in grand 
politics outside. The cabinet is simply this organization. However, in 
relation to die public, especially die parliamentary public, die party 
needed a leader responsible for all decisions— die cabinet head. The 
English system has been taken over on die Continent in die form of 
parliamentary ministries. In America alone, and in die democracies 
influenced by America, a quite heterogeneous system was placed 
into opposition widi this system. The American system placed die 
directiy and popularly elected leader of die victorious party at the 
head of the apparatus of officials appointed by him and bound him 
to the consent of 'parliament' only in budgetary and legislative mat- 
ters. 

The development of politics into an organization which de- 
manded training in the struggle for power, and in die mediods of 
diis struggle as developed by modern party policies, determined the 



14 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



separation of public functionaries into two categories, which, howev- 
er, are by no means rigidly but nevertheless distinctly separated. 
These categories are 'administrative' officials on the one hand, and 
'political' officials on the other. The 'political' officials, in tire ge- 
nuine sense of tire word, can regularly and externally be recognized 
by tire fact that they can be transferred any time at will, that they can 
be dismissed, or at least temporarily withdrawn. They are like the 
French prefects and the comparable officials of other countries, and 
this is in sharp contrast to the 'independence' of officials with judi- 
cial functions. In England, officials who, according to fixed conven- 
tion, retire from office when there is a change in tire parliamentary 
majority, and hence a change in the cabinet, belong to this category. 
There are usually among them some whose competence includes 
tire management of tire general 'inner administration.' The political 
element consists, above all, in the task of maintaining 'law and or- 
der' in the country, hence maintaining the existing power relations. 
In Prussia these officials, in accordance with Puttkamer's decree and 
in order to avoid censure, were obliged to 'represent the policy of 
tire government.' And, like the prefects in France, they were used as 
an official apparatus for influencing elections. Most of the 'political' 
officials of the German system— in contrast to other countries— were 
equally qualified in so far as access to these offices required a uni- 
versity education, special examinations, and special preparatory ser- 
vice. In Germany, only tire heads of tire political apparatus, tire mi- 
nisters, lack this specific characteristic of modern civil service. Even 
under the old regime, one could be tire Prussian minister of educa- 
tion without ever having attended an institution of higher learning; 
whereas one could become Vortragender Rat, 1 in principle, only on 
the basis of a prescribed examination. The specialist and trained 
Dezernent* and Vortragender Rat were of course infinitely better 
informed about tire real technical problems of the division than was 
their respective chief— for instance, under Althoff in the Prussian 
ministry of education. In England it was not different. Consequently, 
in all routine demands tire divisional head was more powerful than 
tire minister, which was not without reason. The minister was simply 
the representative of tire political power constellation; he had to 
represent these powerful political staffs and he had to take measure 
of the proposals of his subordinate expert officials or give them di- 
rective orders of a political nature. 

After all, tilings in a private economic enterprise are quite simi- 
lar: the real 'sovereign,' the assembled shareholders, is just as little 
influential in tire business management as is a 'people' ruled by ex- 
pert officials. And the personages who decide the policy of the en- 
terprise, the bank-controlled 'directorate,' give only directive eco- 
nomic orders and select persons for tire management without them- 
selves being capable of technically directing tire enterprise. Thus the 
present structure of the revolutionary state signifies nothing new in 



15 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



principle. It places power over the administration into the hands of 
absolute dilettantes, who, by virtue of their control of the machine- 
guns, would like to use expert officials only as executive heads and 
hands. The difficulties of die present system lie elsewhere dian here, 
but today diese difficulties shall not concern us. We shall, rather, 
ask for die typical peculiarity of the professional politicians, of die 
'leaders' as well as their followings. Their nature has changed and 
today varies greatly from one case to another. 

We have seen that in die past 'professional politicians' devel- 
oped through die struggle of die princes with the estates and that 
they served the princes. Let us briefly review die major types of 
these professional politicians. 

Confronting die estates, the prince found support in politically 
exploitable strata outside of die order of die estates. Among die lat- 
ter, there was, first, die clergy in Western and Lastern India, in 
Buddhist China and Japan, and in Lamaist Mongolia, just as in the 
Christian territories of die Middle Ages. The clergy were technically 
useful because they were literate. The importation of Brahmins, 
Buddhist priests, Lamas, and die employment of bishops and priests 
as political counselors, occurred with an eye to obtaining administra- 
tive forces who could read and write and who could be used in the 
struggle of die emperor, prince, or Khan against die aristocracy. Un- 
like die vassal who confronted his overlord, die cleric, especially the 
celibate cleric, stood outside die machinery of normal political and 
economic interests and was not tempted by die struggle for political 
power, for himself or for his descendants. By virtue of his own sta- 
tus, die cleric was 'separated' from die managerial implements of 
princely administration. 

The humanistically educated literati comprised a second such 
stratum. There was a time when one learned to produce Latin 
speeches and Greek verses in order to become a political adviser to 
a prince and, above all things, to become a memorialist. This was 
the time of die first flowering of die humanist schools and of the 
princely foundations of professorships for 'poetics.' This was for us 
a transitory epoch, which has had a quite persistent influence upon 
our educational system, yet no deeper results politically. In East 
Asia, it has been different. The Chinese mandarin is, or rather orig- 
inally was, what the humanist of our Renaissance period approx- 
imately was: a literator humanistically trained and tested in die lan- 
guage monuments of the remote past. When you read die diaries of 
Li Hung Chang you will find that he is most proud of having com- 
posed poems and of being a good calligrapher. This stratum, with its 
conventions developed and modeled after Chinese Antiquity, has 
determined the whole destiny of China; and perhaps our fate would 
have been similar if die humanists in their time had had die slightest 
chance of gaining a similar influence. 

The third stratum was the court nobility. After the princes had 



16 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



succeeded in expropriating political power from the nobility as an 
estate, they drew the nobles to the court and used them in their po- 
litical and diplomatic service. The transformation of our educational 
system in the seventeenth century was partly determined by the fact 
that court nobles as professional politicians displaced the humanist 
literati and entered the service of the princes. 

The fourth category was a specifically English institution. A pa- 
trician stratum developed there which was comprised of the petty 
nobility and tire urban rentiers; technically they are called tire 'gen- 
try.' The English gentry represents a stratum that tire prince original- 
ly attracted in order to counter the barons. The prince placed the 
stratum in possession of the offices of 'self-government,' and later he 
himself became increasingly dependent upon them. The gentry 
maintained the possession of all offices of local administration by 
taking them over without compensation in tire interest of their own 
social power. The gentry has saved England from tire bureaucratiza- 
tion which has been the fate of all continental states. 

A fifth stratum, tire university-trained jurist, is peculiar to tire 
Occident, especially to tire European continent, and has been of 
decisive significance for tire Continent's whole political structure. 
The tremendous after-effect of Roman law, as transformed by the 
late Roman bureaucratic state, stands out in nothing more clearly 
than tire fact that everywhere tire revolution of political management 
in tire direction of tire evolving rational state has been borne by 
trained jurists. This also occurred in England, although there the 
great national guilds of jurists hindered tire reception of Roman law. 
There is no analogy to this process to be found in any area of the 
world. 

All beginnings of rational juristic drinking in tire Indian Minranr- 
sa School and all further cultivation of tire ancient juristic thinking in 
Islam have been unable to prevent tire idea of rational law from be- 
ing overgrown by theological forms of thought. Above all, legal trial 
procedure has not been fully rationalized in tire cases of India and 
of Islanrisnr. Such rationalization has been brought about on the 
Continent only through tire borrowing of ancient Roman jurispru- 
dence by tire Italian jurists. Roman jurisprudence is tire product of a 
political structure arising from the city state to world domination— a 
product of quite unique nature. The usus modernus of the late me- 
dieval pandect jurists and canonists was blended with theories of 
natural law, which were born from juristic and Christian thought and 
which were later secularized. This juristic rationalism has had its 
great representatives among tire Italian Podesta, tire French crown 
jurists (who created tire formal means for tire undermining of the 
rule of seigneurs by royal power), among tire canonists and tire theo- 
logians of tire ecclesiastic councils (drinking in terms of natural law), 
among the court jurists and academic judges of tire continental 
princes, among tire Netlrerland teachers of natural law and the mo- 



17 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



narchomachists, among die English crown and parliamentary jurists, 
among die noblesse de robe of die French Parliament, and finally, 
among die lawyers of the age of die French Revolution. 

Widiout diis juristic rationalism, die rise of the absolute state is 
just as littie imaginable as is the Revolution. If you look dirough die 
remonstrances of die French Parliaments or dirough die cahiers of 
die French Estates-General from the sixteendi century to die year 
1789, you will find everywhere the spirit of the jurists. And if you go 
over die occupational composition of die members of die French 
Assembly, you will find diere— aldiough die members of die Assem- 
bly were elected dirough equal franchise— a single proletarian, very 
few bourgeois enterprisers, but jurists of all sorts, en masse. Without 
diem, die specific mentality diat inspired diese radical intellectuals 
and dieir projects would be quite inconceivable. Since die French 
Revolution, the modern lawyer and modern democracy absolutely 
belong togedier. And lawyers, in our sense of an independent status 
group, also exist only in the Occident. They have developed since 
die Middle Ages from die Fiirsprech of die formalistic Germanic 
legal procedure under die impact of die rationalization of die trial. 

The significance of die lawyer in Occidental politics since die 
rise of parties is not accidental. The management of politics through 
parties simply means management dirough interest groups. We shall 
soon see what that means. The craft of die trained lawyer is to plead 
effectively die cause of interested clients. In this, the lawyer is supe- 
rior to any 'official,' as die superiority of enemy propaganda [Allied 
propaganda 1914-18] could teach us. Certainly he can advocate and 
win a cause supported by logically weak arguments and one which, 
in diis sense, is a 'weak' cause. Yet he wins it because technically he 
makes a 'strong case' for it. But only the lawyer successfully pleads a 
cause diat can be supported by logically strong arguments, dius han- 
dling a 'good' cause 'well.' All too often die civil servant as a politi- 
cian turns a cause diat is good in every sense into a 'weak' cause, 
dirough technically 'weak' pleading. This is what we have had to ex- 
perience. To an outstanding degree, politics today is in fact con- 
ducted in public by means of die spoken or written word. To weigh 
die effect of die word properly falls within die range of die lawyer's 
tasks; but not at all into diat of the civil servant. The latter is no de- 
magogue, nor is it his purpose to be one. If he neverdieless tries to 
become a demagogue, he usually becomes a very poor one. 

According to his proper vocation, die genuine official— and diis 
is decisive for die evaluation of our former regime— will not engage 
in politics. Radier, he should engage in impartial 'administration.' 
This also holds for the so-called 'political' administrator, at least of- 
ficially, in so far as die raison d'etat, diat is, die vital interests of die 
ruling order, are not in question. Sine ira et studio, 'widiout scorn 
and bias,' he shall administer his office. Hence, he shall not do pre- 
cisely what the politician, the leader as well as his following, must 



18 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



always and necessarily do, namely, fight. 

To take a stand, to be passionate— ha et studium—is die politi- 
cian's element, and above all die element of die political leader. His 
conduct is subject to quite a different, indeed, exacdy die opposite, 
principle of responsibility from diat of die civil servant. The honor 
of die civil servant is vested in his ability to execute conscientiously 
the order of die superior audiorities, exactly as if the order agreed 
widi his own conviction. This holds even if the order appears wrong 
to him and if, despite die civil servant's remonstrances, die autiiority 
insists on die order. Widiout diis moral discipline and self-denial, in 
the highest sense, die whole apparatus would fall to pieces. The 
honor of die political leader, of die leading statesman, however, lies 
precisely in an exclusive personal responsibility for what he does, a 
responsibility he cannot and must not reject or transfer. It is in die 
nature of officials of high moral standing to be poor politicians, and 
above all, in the political sense of die word, to be irresponsible poli- 
ticians. In this sense, they are politicians of low moral standing, such 
as we unfortunately have had again and again in leading positions. 
This is what we have called Beamtenherrschaft [civil-sendee rule], 
and truly no spot soils die honor of our officialdom if we reveal what 
is politically wrong with the system from die standpoint of success. 
But let us return once more to die types of political figures. 

Since die time of die constitutional state, and definitely since 
democracy has been established, the 'demagogue' has been die typi- 
cal political leader in die Occident. The distasteful flavor of the 
word must not make us forget that not Cleon but Pericles was the 
first to bear die name of demagogue. In contrast to die offices of 
ancient democracy diat were filled by lot, Pericles led die sovereign 
Ecclesia of die demos of Athens as a supreme strategist holding the 
only elective office or without holding any office at all. Modern de- 
magoguery also makes use of oratory, even to a tremendous extent, 
if one considers die election speeches a modern candidate has to 
deliver. But die use of die printed word is more enduring. The polit- 
ical publicist, and above all die journalist, is nowadays the most im- 
portant representative of die demagogic species. 

Widiin die limits of this lecture, it is quite impossible even to 
sketch the sociology of modern political journalism, which in every 
respect constitutes a chapter in itself. Certainly, only a few tilings 
concerning it are in place here. In common with all demagogues 
and, by die way, widi die lawyer (and die artist), die journalist shares 
the fate of lacking a fixed social classification. At least, this is die case 
on die Continent, in contrast to die English, and, by the way, also to 
former conditions in Prussia. The journalist belongs to a sort of pa- 
riah caste, which is always estimated by 'society' in terms of its etiii- 
cally lowest representative. Hence, die strangest notions about jour- 
nalists and dieir work are abroad. Not everybody realizes diat a real- 
ly good journalistic accomplishment requires at least as much 'ge- 



19 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



nius' as any scholarly accomplishment, especially hecause of the ne- 
cessity of producing at once and 'on order,' and hecause of the ne- 
cessity of being effective, to be sure, under quite different conditions 
of production. It is almost never acknowledged that the responsi- 
bility of die journalist is far greater, and that the sense of responsibil- 
ity of every honorable journalist is, on the average, not a bit lower 
than that of the scholar, but rather, as the war has shown, higher. 
This is because, in the very nature of the case, irresponsible journa- 
listic accomplishments and their often terrible effects are remem- 
bered. 

Nobody believes that the discretion of any able journalist ranks 
above the average of other people, and yet that is the case. The quite 
incomparably graver temptations, and the other conditions that ac- 
company journalistic work at the present time, produce those results 
which have conditioned the public to regard the press with a mixture 
of disdain and pitiful cowardice. Today we cannot discuss what is to 
be done. Here we are interested in the question of the occupational 
destiny of the political journalist and of his chance to attain a posi- 
tion of political leadership. Thus far, the journalist has had favorable 
chances only in the Social Democratic party. Within the party, edi- 
torial positions have been predominantly in the nature of official 
positions, but editorial positions, have not been the basis for posi- 
tions of leadership. 

In the bourgeois parties, on the whole, the chances for ascent to 
political power along this avenue have rather become worse, as 
compared with those of the previous generation. Naturally every 
politician of consequence has needed influence over the press and 
hence has needed relations with the press. But that party leaders 
would emerge from the ranks of the press has been an absolute ex- 
ception and one should not have expected it. The reason for this 
lies in the strongly increased 'indispensability' of the journalist, 
above all, of tire propertyless and hence professionally bound jour- 
nalist, an indispensability which is determined by tire tremendously 
increased intensity and tempo of journalistic operations. The neces- 
sity of gaining one's livelihood by tire writing of daily or at least 
weekly articles is like lead on tire feet of tire politicians. I know of 
cases in which natural leaders have been permanently paralyzed in 
their ascent to power, externally and above all internally, by this 
compulsion. The relations of the press to tire ruling powers in tire 
state and in tire parties, under tire old regime [of tire Kaiser], were as 
detrimental as they could be to tire level of journalism; but that is a 
chapter in itself. These conditions were different in tire countries of 
our opponents [tire Allies]. But there also, and for all modern states, 
apparently tire journalist worker gains less and less as tire capitalist 
lord of tire press, of the sort of 'Lord' Northcliffe, for instance, gains 
more and more political influence. 

Thus far, however, our great capitalist newspaper concerns, 



20 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



which attained control, especially over the 'chain newspapers,' with 
'want ads,' have heen regularly and typically the hreeders of political 
indifference. For no profits could he made in an independent poli- 
cy; especially no profitahle benevolence of the politically dominant 
powers could be obtained. The advertising business is also the ave- 
nue along which, during the war, the attempt was made to influence 
the press politically in a grand style— an attempt which apparently it 
is regarded as desirable to continue now. Although one may expect 
the great papers to escape this pressure, the situation of the small 
ones will be far more difficult. In any case, for the time being, the 
journalist career is not among us, a normal avenue for the ascent of 
political leaders, whatever attraction journalism may otherwise have 
and whatever measure of influence, range of activity, and especially 
political responsibility it may yield. One has to wait and see. Perhaps 
journalism does not have this function any longer, or perhaps jour- 
nalism does not yet have it. Whether the renunciation of the prin- 
ciple of anonymity would mean a change in this is difficult to say. 
Some journalists— not all— believe in dropping principled anonymity. 
What we have experienced during the war in the German press, and 
in the 'management' of newspapers by especially hired personages 
and talented writers who always expressly figured under their names, 
has unfortunately shown, in some of the better known cases, that an 
increased awareness of responsibility is not so certain to be bred as 
might be believed. Some of the papers were, without regard to party, 
precisely the notoriously worst boulevard sheets; by dropping ano- 
nymity they strove for and attained greater sales. The publishers as 
well as the journalists of sensationalism have gained fortunes but cer- 
tainly not honor. Nothing is here being said against the principle of 
promoting sales; the question is indeed an intricate one, and the 
phenomenon of irresponsible sensationalism does not hold in gen- 
eral. But thus far, sensationalism has not been the road to genuine 
leadership or to the responsible management of politics. How con- 
ditions will further develop remains to be seen. Yet the journalist 
career remains under all circumstances one of the most important 
avenues of professional political activity. It is not a road for every- 
body, least of all for weak characters, especially for people who can 
maintain their inner balance only with a secure status position. If the 
life of a young scholar is a gamble, still he is walled in by firm status 
conventions, which prevent him from slipping. But the journalist's 
life is an absolute gamble in every respect and under conditions that 
test one's inner security in a way that scarcely occurs in any other 
situation. The often bitter experiences in occupational life are per- 
haps not even the worst. The inner demands that are directed pre- 
cisely at the successful journalist are especially difficult. It is, indeed, 
no small matter to frequent the salons of the powerful on this earth 
on a seemingly equal footing and often to be flattered by all because 
one is feared, yet knowing all the time that having hardly closed the 



21 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



door die host has perhaps to justify hefore his guests his association 
widi the 'scavengers from die press.' Moreover, it is no small matter 
diat one must express oneself prompdy and convincingly ahout tiiis 
and diat, on all conceivable problems of life— whatever die 'market' 
happens to demand— and tiiis without becoming absolutely shallow 
and above all without losing one's dignity by baring oneself, a tiling 
which has merciless results. It is not astonishing that there are many 
journalists who have become human failures and worthless men. 
Rather, it is astonishing that, despite all this, this very stratum in- 
cludes such a great number of valuable and quite genuine men, a 
fact tiiat outsiders would not so easily guess. 

If the journalist as a type of professional politician harks back to 
a rather considerable past, die figure of die party official belongs on- 
ly to the development of die last decades and, in part, only to recent 
years. In order to comprehend die position of tiiis figure in histori- 
cal evolution, we shall have to turn to a consideration of parties and 
party organizations. 

In all political associations which are somehow extensive, that is, 
associations going beyond die sphere and range of die tasks of small 
rural districts where power-holders are periodically elected, political 
organization is necessarily managed by men interested in die man- 
agement of politics. This is to say that a relatively small number of 
men are primarily interested in political life and hence interested in 
sharing political power. They provide themselves widi a following 
through free recruitment, present themselves or their proteges as 
candidates for election, collect the financial means, and go out for 
vote -grabbing. It is unimaginable how in large associations elections 
could function at all without tiiis managerial pattern. In practice tiiis 
means the division of die citizens with the right to vote into political- 
ly active and politically passive elements. This difference is based on 
voluntary attitudes, hence it cannot be abolished through measures 
like obligatory voting, or 'occupational status group' representation, 
or similar measures that are expressly or actually directed against 
tiiis state of affairs and die rule of professional politicians. The active 
leadership and dieir freely recruited following are die necessary 
elements in the life of any party. The following, and dirough it the 
passive electorate, are necessary for the election of the leader. But 
the structure of parties varies. For instance, the 'parties' of the me- 
dieval cities, such as those of die Guelfs and the Ghibellines, were 
purely personal followings. If one considers various tilings about 
these medieval parties, one is reminded of Bolshevism and its So- 
viets. Consider the Statute della perte Guelfa, the confiscations of 
the Nobili's estates— which originally meant all those families who 
lived a chivalrous life and who dius qualified for fiefs— consider die 
exclusion from office-holding and die denial of die right to vote, die 
inter-local party committees, die strictly military organizations and 
the premiums for informers. Then consider Bolshevism widi its 



22 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



strictly sieved military and, in Russia especially, informer organiza- 
tions, the disarmament and denial of the political rights of the 'bour- 
geois,' that is, of the entrepreneur, trader, rentier, clergyman, des- 
cendants of the dynasty, police agents, as well as the confiscation 
policy. 

This analog}' is still more striking when one considers diat, on 
die one hand, die military organization of die medieval party consti- 
tuted a pure army of knights organized on the basis of die registered 
feudal estates and that nobles occupied almost all leading positions, 
and, on die other hand, that die Soviets have preserved, or rather 
reintroduced, the highly paid enterpriser, die group wage, the Tay- 
lor system, military and workshop discipline, and a search for for- 
eign capital. Hence, in a word, the Soviets have had to accept again 
absolutely all die tilings that Bolshevism had been fighting as bour- 
geois class institutions. They have had to do this in order to keep the 
state and the economy going at all. Moreover, the Soviets have reins- 
tituted die agents of the former Ochrana [Tsarist Secret Police] as 
the main instrument of their state power. But here we do not have 
to deal with such organizations for violence, but rather with profes- 
sional politicians who strive for power through sober and 'peaceful' 
party campaigns in the market of election votes. 

Parties, in the sense usual with us, were at first, for instance in 
England, pure followings of the aristocracy. If, for any reason what- 
ever, a peer changed his party, everybody dependent upon him 
likewise changed. Up to the Reform Bill [of 1832], the great noble 
families and, last but not least, the king controlled the patronage of 
an immense number of election boroughs. Close to these aristocrat- 
ic parties were the parties of notables, which develop everywhere 
with the rising power of the bourgeois. Under the spiritual leader- 
ship of die typical intellectual strata of the Occident, the propertied 
and cultured circles differentiated themselves into parties and fol- 
lowed them. These parties were formed partly according to class 
interest, partly according to family traditions, and partly for ideologi- 
cal reasons. Clergymen, teachers, professors, lawyers, doctors, apo- 
thecaries, prosperous farmers, manufacturers— in England the whole 
stratum that considered itself as belonging to the class of gentle- 
men—formed, at first, occasional associations at most local political 
clubs. In times of unrest the petty bourgeoisie raised its voice, and 
once in a while the proletariat, if leaders arose who, however, as a 
rule did not stem from their midst. In this phase, parties organized 
as permanent associations between localities do not yet exist in the 
open country. Only the parliamentary delegates create the cohesion; 
and die local notables are decisive for the selection of candidates. 
The election programs originate partly in the election appeals of the 
candidates and partly in the meetings of the notables; or, they origi- 
nate as resolutions of the parliamentary party. Leadership of the 
clubs is an avocation and an honorific pursuit, as demanded by the 



23 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



occasion. 

Where clubs are absent (as is mostly the case), the quite form- 
less management of politics in normal times lies in the hands of tire 
few people constantly interested in it. Only the journalist is a paid 
professional politician; only tire management of the newspaper is a 
continuous political organization. Besides the newspaper, there is 
only tire parliamentary session. The parliamentary delegates and tire 
parliamentary party leaders know to which local notables one turns 
if a political action seems desirable. But permanent associations of 
tire parties exist only in the large cities with moderate contributions 
of tire members and periodical conferences and public meetings 
where the delegate gives account of tire parliamentary activities. The 
party is alive only during election periods. 

The members of parliament are interested in tire possibility of 
interlocal electoral compromises, in vigorous and unified programs 
endorsed by broad circles and in a unified agitation throughout the 
country. In general these interests form the driving force of a party 
organization which becomes more and more strict. In principle, 
however, tire nature of a party apparatus as an association of no- 
tables remains unchanged. This is so, even though a network of lo- 
cal party affiliations and agents is spread over the whole country, in- 
cluding middle-sized cities. A member of tire parliamentary party 
acts as tire leader of tire central party office and maintains constant 
correspondence with tire local organizations. Outside of tire central 
bureau, paid officials are still absent; thoroughly 'respectable' people 
head tire local organizations for tire sake of tire deference which they 
enjoy anyway. They form tire extra-parliamentary 'notables' who ex- 
ert influence alongside tire stratum of political notables who happen 
to sit in parliament. However, tire party correspondence, edited by 
tire party, increasingly provides intellectual nourishment for tire 
press and for tire local meetings. Regular contributions of tire mem- 
bers become indispensable; a part of these must cover tire expenses 
of headquarters. 

Not so long ago most of tire German party organizations were 
still in this stage of development. In France, the first stage of party 
development was, at least in part, still predominant, and the organi- 
zation of tire members of parliament was quite unstable. In tire open 
country, we find a small number of local notables and programs 
drafted by tire candidates or set up for them by their patrons in spe- 
cific campaigns for office. To be sure, these platforms constitute 
more or less local adaptations to tire resolutions and programs of 
the members of parliament. This system was only partially punc- 
tured. The number of full-time professional politicians was small, 
consisting in the main of the elected deputies, tire few employees of 
headquarters, and tire journalists. In France, the system has also in- 
cluded those job hunters who held 'political office' or, at tire mo- 
ment, strove for one. Politics was formally and by far predominantly 



24 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



an avocation. The number of delegates qualifying for ministerial of- 
fice was also very restricted and, because of their position as no- 
tables, so was the number of election candidates. 

However, the number of those who indirectly had a stake in the 
management of politics, especially a material one, was very large. 
For, all administrative measures of a ministerial department, and 
especially all decisions in matters of personnel, were made partly 
with a view to their influence upon electoral chances. The realiza- 
tion of each and every kind of wish was sought through tire local 
delegate's mediation. For better or for worse tire minister had to 
lend his ear to this delegate, especially if tire delegate belonged to 
the minister's majority. Hence everybody strove for such influence. 
The single deputy controlled tire patronage of office and, in general, 
any kind of patronage in his election district. In order to be re- 
elected the deputy, in turn, maintained connections with tire local 
notables. 

Now then, the most modern forms of party organizations stand 
in sharp contrast to this idyllic state in which circles of notables and, 
above all, members of parliament rule. These modern forms are tire 
children of democracy, of mass franchise, of tire necessity to woo 
and organize tire masses, and develop the utmost unity of direction 
and tire strictest discipline. The rule of notables and guidance by 
members of parliament ceases. 'Professional' politicians outside tire 
parliaments take the organization in hand. They do so either as 'en- 
trepreneurs'—the American boss and tire English election agent are, 
in fact, such entrepreneurs— or as officials with a fixed salary. For- 
mally, a fargoing democratization takes place. The parliamentary 
party no longer creates the authoritative programs, and the local no- 
tables no longer decide the selection of candidates. Rather assem- 
blies of tire organized party members select tire candidates and dele- 
gate members to tire assemblies of a higher order. Possibly there are 
several such conventions leading up to the national convention of 
the party. Naturally power actually rests in tire hands of those who, 
within the organization, handle the work continuously. Otherwise, 
power rests in tire hands of those on whom tire organization in its 
processes depends financially or personally— for instance, on the 
Maecenases or the directors of powerful political clubs of interested 
persons (Tammany Hall). It is decisive that this whole apparatus of 
people— characteristically called a 'machine' in Anglo-Saxon coun- 
tries—or rather those who direct tire machine, keep tire members of 
tire parliament in check. They are in a position to impose their will 
to a rather far-reaching extent, and that is of special significance for 
the selection of tire party leader. The man whom tire machine fol- 
lows now becomes tire leader, even over tire head of tire parliamen- 
tary party. In other words, the creation of such machines signifies 
tire advent of plebiscitarian democracy. 

The party following, above all tire party official and party entre- 



25 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



preneur, naturally expect personal compensation from the victory of 
their leader— that is, offices or other advantages. It is decisive that 
they expect such advantages from their leader and not merely from 
the individual member of parliament. They expect that die dema- 
gogic effect of the leader's personality during the election light of the 
party will increase votes and mandates and thereby power, and, the- 
reby, as far as possible, will extend opportunities to their followers to 
find die compensation for which they hope. Ideally, one of their 
mainsprings is tire satisfaction of working with loyal personal devo- 
tion for a man, and not merely for an abstract program of a party 
consisting of mediocrities. In this respect, the 'charismatic' element 
of all leadership is at work in the party system. 

In very different degrees this system made headway, although it 
was in constant, latent struggle with local notables and the members 
of parliament who wrangled for influence. This was tire case in tire 
bourgeois parties, first, in the United States, and, then, in tire Social 
Democratic party, especially of Germany. Constant setbacks occur 
as soon as no generally recognized leader exists, and, even when he 
is found, concessions of all sorts must be made to tire vanity and the 
personal interest of the party notables. The machine may also be 
brought under tire domination of tire party officials in whose hands 
tire regular business rests. According to tire view of some Social 
Democratic circles, their party had succumbed to this 'bureaucrati- 
zation.' But 'officials' submit relatively easily to a leader's personality 
if it has a strong demagogic appeal. The material and tire ideal inter- 
ests of tire officials are intimately connected with the effects of party 
power which are expected from tire leader's appeal, and besides, 
inwardly it is per se more satisfying to work for a leader. The ascent 
of leaders is far more difficult where tire notables, along with the of- 
ficials, control tire party, as is usually tire case in tire bourgeois par- 
ties. For ideally the notables make 'their way of life' out of tire petty 
chairmanships or committee memberships they hold. Resentment 
against the demagogue as a homo novus, the conviction of the supe- 
riority of political party 'experience' (which, as a matter of fact, ac- 
tually is of considerable importance), and tire ideological concern 
for the crumbling of tire old party traditions— these factors determine 
the conduct of die notables. They can count on all tire traditionalist 
elements within the party. Above all, tire rural but also the petty 
bourgeois voter looks for the name of the notable familiar to him. 
He distrusts the man who is unknown to him. However, once this 
man has become successful, he clings to him the more unwavering- 
ly. Let us now consider, by some major examples, the struggle of the 
two structural forms— of tire notables and of tire party— and especially 
let us consider tire ascendancy of tire plebiscitarian form as de- 
scribed by Ostrogorsky. 

First Lngland: there until 1868 the party organization was almost 
purely an organization of notables. The Tories in the country found 



26 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



support, for instance, from tire Anglican parson, and from tire 
schoolmaster, and above all from tire large landlords of tire respec- 
tive county. The Whigs found support mostiy from such people as 
the nonconformist preacher (when drere was one), the postmaster, 
dre blacksmith, dre tailor, dre ropemaker— drat is, from such artisans 
who could disseminate political influence because drey could chat 
widr people most frequently. In tire city the parties differed, pardy 
according to economics, pardy according to religion, and pardy 
simply according to tire party opinions handed down in tire families. 
But always tire notables were the pillars of tire political organization. 

Above all drese arrangements stood Parliament, the parties widr 
the cabinet, and the 'leader,' who was the chairman of dre council of 
ministers or the leader of tire opposition. This leader had beside 
him tire 'whip'— tire most important professional politician of tire 
party organization. Patronage of office was vested in tire hands of the 
'whip'; drus tire job hunter had to turn to him and he arranged air 
understanding widr tire deputies of tire individual election boroughs. 
A stratum of professional politicians gradually began to develop in 
tire boroughs. At first tire locally recruited agents were not paid; drey 
occupied approximately tire same position as our Vertrauens- 
mknner However, along widr drem, a capitalist entrepreneurial type 
developed in tire boroughs. This was the 'election agent,' whose ex- 
istence was unavoidable under England's modern legislation which 
guaranteed fair elections. 

This legislation aimed at controlling tire campaign costs of elec- 
tions and sought to check tire power of money by making it obliga- 
tory for tire candidate to state tire costs of his campaign. For in Eng- 
land, tire candidate, besides straining his voice— far more so dran was 
formerly tire case widr us [in Germany]— enjoyed stretching his 
purse. The election agent made tire candidate pay a lump sum, 
which usually meant a good deal for tire agent. In tire distribution of 
power in Parliament and tire country between tire 'leader' and the 
party notables, tire leader in England used to hold a very eminent 
position. This position was based on tire compelling fact of making 
possible a grand, and drereby steady, political strategy. Neverdreless 
the influence of the parliamentary party and of party notables was 
still considerable. 

That is about what the old party organization looked like. It was 
half air affair of notables and half an entrepreneurial organization 
widr salaried employees. Since 1868, however, tire 'caucus' system 
developed, first for local elections in Birmingham, dren all over tire 
country. A nonconformist parson and along with him Joseph 
Chamberlain brought dris system to life. The occasion for this de- 
velopment was tire democratization of tire franchise. In order to win 
the masses it became necessary to call into being a tremendous ap- 
paratus of apparendy democratic associations. Air electoral associa- 
tion had to be formed in every city district to help keep tire organiza- 



27 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



tion incessantly in motion and to bureaucratize everything rigidly. 
Hence, hired and paid officials of the local electoral committees in- 
creased numerically; and, on the whole, perhaps 10 per cent of the 
voters were organized in these local committees. The elected party 
managers had the right to co-opt others and were the formal bearers 
of party politics. The driving force was the local circle, which was, 
above all, composed of those interested in municipal politics— from 
which the fattest material opportunities always spring. These local 
circles were also first to call upon the world of finance. This newly 
emerging machine, which was no longer led by members of Parlia- 
ment, very soon had to struggle with the previous power-holders, 
above all, with the 'whip.' Being supported by locally interested per- 
sons, the machine came out of the light so victoriously that the whip 
had to submit and compromise with the machine. The result was a 
centralization of all power in the hands of the few and, ultimately, of 
the one person who stood at the top of the party. The whole system 
had arisen in the Liberal party in connection with Gladstone's ascent 
to power. What brought this machine to such swift triumph over the 
notables was the fascination of Gladstone's 'grand' demagog}', the 
firm belief of the masses in the ethical substance of his policy, and, 
above all, their belief in the ethical character of his personality. It 
soon became obvious that a Caesarist plebiscitarian element in poli- 
tics— die dictator of the battlefield of elections— had appeared on the 
plain. In 1877 the caucus became active for the first time in national 
elections, and with brilliant success, for the result was Disraeli's fall 
at the height of his great achievements. In 1866, the machine was 
already so completely oriented to the charismatic personality that 
when the question of home rule was raised the whole apparatus 
from top to bottom did not question whether it actually stood on 
Gladstone's ground; it simply, on his word, fell in line with him: they 
said, Gladstone right or wrong, we follow him. And thus the ma- 
chine deserted its own creator, Chamberlain. 

Such machinery requires a considerable personnel. In England 
there are about 2,000 persons who live directly off party politics. To 
be sure, those who are active in politics purely as job seekers or as 
interested persons are far more numerous, especially in municipal 
politics. In addition to economic opportunities, for the useful caucus 
politician, there are the opportunities to satisfy his vanity. To be- 
come 'J.P.' or even 'M.P.' is, of course, in line with the greatest (and 
normal) ambition; and such people, who are of demonstrably good 
breeding, that is, 'gentlemen,' attain their goal. The highest goal is, 
of course, a peerage, especially for the great financial Maecenases. 
About 50 per cent of the finances of the party depend on contribu- 
tions of donors who remained anonymous. 

Now then, what has been the effect of this whole system? No- 
wadays the members of Parliament, with the exception of the few 
cabinet members (and a few insurgents), are normally nothing better 



28 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



than well-disciplined 'yes' men. Widi us, in die Reichstag, one used 
at least to take care of one's private correspondence on his desk, 
dius indicating that one was active in die weal of die country. Such 
gestures are not demanded in England; die member of Parliament 
must only vote, not commit party treason. He must appear when die 
whips call him, and do what die cabinet or die leader of die opposi- 
tion orders. The caucus machine in die open country is almost 
completely unprincipled if a strong leader exists who has the ma- 
chine absolutely in hand. Therewith the plebiscitarian dictator ac- 
tually stands above Parliament. He brings die masses behind him by 
means of die machine and die members of Parliament are for him 
merely political spoilsmen enrolled in his following. 

How does die selection of these strong leaders take place? First, 
in terms of what ability are diey selected? Next to die qualities of 
will— decisive all over die world— naturally die force of demagogic 
speech is above all decisive. Its character has changed since the time 
speakers like Cobden addressed themselves to die intellect, and 
Gladstone who mastered die technique of apparently 'letting sober 
facts speak for themselves.' At die present time often purely emo- 
tional means are used— the means the Salvation Army also exploits 
in order to set the masses in motion. One may call die existing state 
of affairs a 'dictatorship resting on the exploitation of mass emotio- 
nality.' Yet, die highly developed system of committee work in die 
English Parliament makes it possible and compelling for every poli- 
tician who counts on a share in leadership to cooperate in commit- 
tee work. All important ministers of recent decades have this very 
real and effective work-training as a background. The practice of 
committee reports and public criticism of these deliberations is a 
condition for training, for really selecting leaders and eliminating 
mere demagogues. 

Thus it is in England. The caucus system diere, however, has 
been a weak form, compared with die American party organization, 
which brought die plebiscitarian principle to an especially early and 
an especially pure expression. 

According to Washington's idea, America was to be a com- 
monwealdi administered by 'gentlemen.' In his time, in America, a 
gentleman was also a landlord, or a man with a college education— 
this was the case at first. In die beginning, when parties began to or- 
ganize, die members of die House of Representatives claimed to be 
leaders, just as in England at die time when notables ruled. The par- 
ty organization was quite loose and continued to be until 1824. In 
some communities, where modern development first took place, the 
party machine was in the making even before the eighteen-twenties. 
But when Andrew Jackson was first elected President— die election 
of the western farmers' candidate— die old traditions were overth- 
rown. Formal party leadership by leading members of Congress 
came to an end soon after 1840, when the great parliamentarians, 



29 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



Calhoun and Webster, retired from political life because Congress 
had lost almost all of its power to the party machine in die open 
country. That die plebiscitarian 'machine' has developed so early in 
America is due to die fact diat diere, and diere alone, the execu- 
tive— diis is what mattered— die chief of office-patronage, was a Pres- 
ident elected by plebiscite. By virtue of the 'separation of powers' he 
was almost independent of parliament in his conduct of office. 
Hence, as die price of victory, the true booty object of die office- 
prebend was held out precisely at die presidential election. Through 
Andrew Jackson die 'spoils system' was quite systematically raised to 
a principle and die conclusions were drawn. 

What does diis spoils system, die turning over of federal offices 
to die following of die victorious candidate, mean for the party for- 
mations of today? It means diat quite unprincipled parties oppose 
one another; diey are purely organizations of job hunters drafting 
their changing platforms according to the chances of vote-grabbing, 
changing their colors to a degree which, despite all analogies, is not 
yet to be found elsewhere. The parties are simply and absolutely 
fashioned for die election campaign that is most important for office 
patronage: die fight for die presidency and for die governorships of 
the separate states. Platforms and candidates are selected at the na- 
tional conventions of die parties without intervention by congress- 
men. Hence they emerge from party conventions, die delegates of 
which are formally, very democratically elected. These delegates are 
determined by meetings of other delegates, who, in turn, owe their 
mandate to die 'primaries,' the assembling of die direct voters of the 
party. In die primaries the delegates are already elected in die name 
of the candidate for the nation's leadership. Widiin die parties the 
most embittered fight rages about die question of 'nomination.' Af- 
ter all, 300,000 to 400,000 official appointments lie in die hands of 
die President, appointments which are executed by him only with 
the approval of the senators from the separate states. Hence the 
senators are powerful politicians. By comparison, however, the 
House of Representatives is, politically, quite impotent, because pa- 
tronage of office is removed from it and because die cabinet mem- 
bers, simply assistants to the President, can conduct office apart 
from die confidence or lack of confidence of die people. The Presi- 
dent, who is legitimatized by die people, confronts everybody, even 
Congress; diis is a result of 'die separation of powers.' 

In America, die spoils system, supported in diis fashion, has 
been technically possible because American culture with its youdi 
could afford purely dilettante management. Widi 300,000 to 
400,000 such party men who have no qualifications to their credit 
otiier than die fact of having performed good sendees for dieir party, 
diis state of affairs of course could not exist without enormous evils. 
A corruption and wastefulness second to none could be tolerated 
only by a country with as yet unlimited economic opportunities. 



30 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



Now then, die boss is die figure who appears in die picture of 
diis system of die plebiscitarian party machine. Who is die boss? He 
is a political capitalist entrepreneur who on his own account and at 
his own risk provides votes. He may have established his first rela- 
tions as a lawyer or a saloonkeeper or as a proprietor of similar es- 
tablishments, or perhaps as a creditor. From here he spins his 
tiireads out until he is able to 'control' a certain number of votes. 
When he has come this far he establishes contact with die neighbor- 
ing bosses, and dirough zeal, skill, and above all discretion, he at- 
tracts die attention of diose who have already furdier advanced in 
the career, and tiien he climbs. The boss is indispensable to die or- 
ganization of die party and die organization is centralized in his 
hands. He substantially provides the financial means. How does he 
get them? Well, pardy by die contributions of die members, and 
especially by taxing die salaries of diose officials who came into of- 
fice dirough him and his party. Furdiermore, there are bribes and 
tips. He who wishes to trespass with impunity one of die many laws 
needs die boss's connivance and must pay for it; or else he will get 
into trouble. But diis alone is not enough to accumulate die neces- 
sary capital for political enterprises. The boss is indispensable as the 
direct recipient of die money of great financial magnates, who would 
not entrust dieir money for election purposes to a paid party official, 
or to anyone else giving public account of his affairs. The boss, with 
his judicious discretion in financial matters, is die natural man for 
diose capitalist circles who finance die election. The typical boss is 
an absolutely sober man. He does not seek social honor; the 'pro- 
fessional' is despised in 'respectable society.' He seeks power alone, 
power as a source of money, but also power for power's sake. In 
contrast to die English leader, die American boss works in die dark. 
He is not heard speaking in public; he suggests to die speakers what 
diey must say in expedient fashion. He himself, however, keeps si- 
lent. As a rule he accepts no office, except diat of senator. For, since 
die senators, by virtue of the Constitution, participate in office pa- 
tronage, die leading bosses often sit in person in this body. The dis- 
tribution of offices is carried out, in die first place, according to ser- 
vices done for die party. But, also, auctioning offices on financial 
bids often occurs and there are certain rates for individual offices; 
hence, a system of selling offices exists which, after all, has often 
been known also to die monarchies, die church-state included, of 
the seventeendi and eighteendi centuries. 

The boss has no firm political 'principles;' he is completely un- 
principled in attitude and asks merely: What will capture votes? Fre- 
quently he is a radier poorly educated man. But as a rule he leads 
an inoffensive and correct private life. In his political morals, how r - 
ever, he naturally adjusts to die average ethical standards of political 
conduct, as a great many of us also may have done during die hoard- 
ing period in die field of economic ediics. 5 That as a 'professional' 



31 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



politician die boss is socially despised does not worry him. That he 
personally does not attain high federal offices, and does not wish to 
do so, has the frequent advantage diat extra-party intellects, dius no- 
tables, may come into candidacy when die bosses believe diey will 
have great appeal value at die polls. Hence the same old party no- 
tables do not run again and again, as is die case in Germany. Thus 
the structure of diese unprincipled parties with their socially des- 
pised power-holders has aided able men to attain the presidency- 
men who widi us never would have come to die top. To be sure, the 
bosses resist an outsider who might jeopardize their sources of 
money and power. Yet in die competitive struggle to win die favor of 
the voters, die bosses frequently have had to condescend and accept 
candidates known to be opponents of corruption. 

Thus there exists a strong capitalist party machine, strictly and 
thoroughly organized from top to bottom, and supported by clubs of 
extraordinary stability. These clubs, such as Tammany Hall, are like 
Knight orders. They seek profits solely through political control, 
especially of the municipal government, which is die most important 
object of booty. This structure of party life was made possible by die 
high degree of democracy in die United States— a 'New Country.' 
This connection, in turn, is the basis for the fact that the system is 
gradually dying out. America can no longer be governed only by di- 
lettantes. Scarcely fifteen years ago, when American workers were 
asked why diey allowed themselves to be governed by politicians 
whom they admitted they despised, die answer was: 'We prefer hav- 
ing people in office whom we can spit upon, rather than a caste of 
officials who spit upon us, as is the case with you.' This was the old 
point of view of American 'democracy.' Even then, the socialists had 
entirely different ideas and now the situation is no longer bearable. 
The dilettante administration does not suffice and die Civil Service 
Reform establishes an ever-increasing number of positions for life 
with pension rights. The reform works out in such a way that univer- 
sity-trained officials, just as incorruptible and quite as capable as our 
officials, get into office. Even now about 100,000 offices have ceased 
being objects of booty to be turned over after elections. Rather, the 
offices qualify their holders for pensions, and are based upon tested 
qualifications. The spoils system will thus gradually recede into the 
background and die nature of party leadership is then likely to be 
transformed also— but as yet, we do not know in what way. 

In Germany, until now, the decisive conditions of political man- 
agement have been in essence as follows: 

First, the parliaments have been impotent. The result has been 
that no man with the qualities of a leader would enter Parliament 
permanently. If one wished to enter Parliament, what could one 
achieve diere? When a chancellery position was open, one could 
tell die administrative chief: 'I have a very able man in my election 
district who would be suitable; take him.' And he would have con- 



32 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



curred with pleasure; but that was about all that a German member 
of Parliament could do to satisfy his instincts for power— if he pos- 
sessed any. 

To diis must be added die tremendous importance of die 
trained expert officialdom in Germany. This factor determined die 
impotence of Parliament. Our officialdom was second to none in 
die world. This importance of the officialdom was accompanied by 
the fact diat die officials claimed not only official positions but also 
cabinet positions for themselves. In the Bavarian state legislature, 
when the introduction of parliamentary government was debated last 
year, it was said that if members of die legislature were to be placed 
in cabinet positions talented people would no longer seek official 
careers. Moreover, die civil-service administration systematically es- 
caped such control as is signified by die English committee discus- 
sions. The administration thus made it impossible for parliaments— 
widi a few exceptions— to train really useful administrative chiefs 
from their own ranks. 

A third factor is that in Germany, in contrast to America, we 
have had parties with principled political views who have maintained 
diat dieir members, at least subjectively, represented bona-fide Wel- 
tanschauungen. Now dien, the two most important of these parties, 
the Catholic Centre Party and die Social Democratic party, have, 
from their inceptions, been minority parties and have meant to be 
minority parties. The leading circles of die Centre party in die Reich 
have never concealed dieir opposition to parliamentarian democra- 
cy, because of fear of remaining in die minority and thus facing great 
difficulties in placing their job hunters in office as they have done by 
exerting pressure on die government. The Social Democratic party 
was a principled minority party and a handicap to die introduction 
of parliamentary government because the party did not wish to stain 
itself by participating in the existing bourgeois political order. The 
fact diat bodi parties dissociated themselves from die parliamentary 
system made parliamentary government impossible. 

Considering all this, what then became of die professional politi- 
cians in Germany? They have had no power, no responsibility, and 
could play only a radier subordinate role as notables. In conse- 
quence, they have been animated anew by the guild instincts, which 
are typical everywhere. It has been impossible for a man who was 
not of their hue to climb high in die circle of those notables who 
made dieir petty positions their lives. I could mention many names 
from every party, die Social Democratic party, of course, not ex- 
cepted, diat spell tragedies of political careers because the persons 
had leadership qualities, and precisely because of these qualities 
were not tolerated by die notables. All our parties have taken this 
course of development and have become guilds of notables. Bebel, 
for instance, was still a leader through temperament and purity of 
character, however modest his intellect. The fact diat he was a mar- 



33 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



tyr, that he never hetrayed confidence in die eyes of die masses, re- 
sulted in his having the masses absolutely behind him. There was no 
power in die party diat could have seriously challenged him. Such 
leadership came to an end, after his death, and the rule of officials 
began. Trade-union officials, party secretaries, and journalists came 
to the top. The instincts of officialdom dominated die party— a high- 
ly respectable officialdom, of rare respectability one may say, com- 
pared to conditions in odier countries, especially die often corrupti- 
ble trade-union officials in America. But die results of control by 
officialdom, which we discussed above, also began in die party. 

Since die eighteen-eighties die bourgeois parties have completely 
become guilds of notables. To be sure, occasionally the parties had 
to draw on extra-party intellects for advertising purposes, so diat diey 
could say, 'We have such and such names.' So far as possible, diey 
avoided letting diese names run for election; only when it was un- 
avoidable and the person insisted could he run for election. The 
same spirit prevailed in Parliament. Our parliamentary parties were 
and are guilds. Every speech delivered from die floor of die Reich- 
stag is dioroughly censored in die party before it is delivered. This is 
obvious from dieir unheard-of boredom. Only he who is sum- 
moned to speak can have die word. One can hardly conceive of a 
stronger contrast to the English, and also— for quite opposite rea- 
sons—die French usage. 

Now, in consequence of die enormous collapse, which is custo- 
marily called die Revolution, perhaps a transformation is under way. 
Perhaps— but not for certain. In die beginning diere were new kinds 
of party apparatuses emerging. First, diere were amateur apparatus- 
es. They are especially often represented by students of die various 
universities, who tell a man to whom diey ascribe leadership quali- 
ties: we want to do die necessary work for you; carry it out. Second- 
ly, there are apparatuses of businessmen. It happened diat men to 
whom leadership qualities were ascribed were approached by 
people willing to take over die propaganda, at fixed rates for every 
vote. If you were to ask me honestly which of diese two apparatuses 
I diink die more reliable, from die purely technical-political point of 
view, I believe I would prefer die latter. But bodi apparatuses were 
fast-emerging bubbles, which swiftly vanished again. The existing 
apparatuses transformed diemselves, but diey continued to work. 
The phenomena are only symptoms of die fact diat new apparatuses 
would come about if diere were only leaders. But even die technical 
peculiarity of proportionate representation precluded dieir ascen- 
dancy. Only a few dictators of die street crowds arose and fell again. 
And only die following of a mob dictatorship is organized in a strict- 
ly disciplined fashion: whence the power of diese vanishing minori- 
ties. 

Let us assume diat all diis were to change; dien, after what has 
been said above, it has to be clearly realized diat die plebiscitarian 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



leadership of parties entails the 'soullessness' of the following, their 
intellectual proletarianization, one might say. In order to he a useful 
apparatus, a machine in the American sense— undisturbed either by 
the vanity of notables or pretensions to independent views— the fol- 
lowing of such a leader must obey him blindly. Lincoln's election 
was possible only through this character of party organization, and 
with Gladstone, as mentioned before, tire same happened in the 
caucus. This is simply the price paid for guidance by leaders. How- 
ever, there is only the choice between leadership democracy with a 
'machine' and leaderless democracy, namely, the rule of profession- 
al politicians without a calling, without the inner charismatic qualities 
that make a leader, and this means what the party insurgents in the 
situation usually designate as 'tire rule of tire clique.' For tire time 
being, we in Germany have only tire latter. For tire future, tire per- 
manence of this situation, at least in the Reich, is primarily facilitated 
by the fact that tire Bundesrat will rise again and will of necessity 
restrict tire power of the Reichstag and therewith its significance as a 
selective agency of leaders. Moreover, in its present form, propor- 
tional representation is a typical phenomenon of leaderless democ- 
racy. This is tire case not only because it facilitates the horse-trading 
of the notables for placement on tire ticket, but also because in the 
future it will give organized interest groups tire possibility of compel- 
ling parties to include their officials in tire list of candidates, thus 
creating an unpolitical Parliament in which genuine leadership finds 
no place. Only tire President of tire Reich could become tire safety- 
valve of tire demand for leadership if he were elected in a plebiscita- 
rian way and not by Parliament. Leadership on tire basis of proved 
work could emerge and selection could take place, especially if, in 
great municipalities, tire plebiscitarian city-manager were to appear 
on tire scene with tire right to organize his bureaus independently. 
Such is tire case in the U.S.A. whenever one wishes to tackle corrup- 
tion seriously. It requires a party organization fashioned for such 
elections. But tire very petty-bourgeois hostility of all parties to lead- 
ers, tire Social Democratic party certainly included, leaves the future 
formation of parties and all these chances still completely in the 
dark. 

Therefore, today, one cannot yet see in any way how tire man- 
agement of politics as a 'vocation' will shape itself. Even less can one 
see along what avenue opportunities are opening to which political 
talents can be put for satisfactory political tasks. He who by his ma- 
terial circumstances is compelled to live 'off politics will almost al- 
ways have to consider tire alternative positions of tire journalist or 
the party official as tire typical direct avenues. Or, he must consider 
a position as representative of interest groups— such as a trade union, 
a chamber of commerce, a farm bureau, 7 a craft association, 8 a labor 
board, an employer's association, et cetera, or else a suitable munic- 
ipal position. Nothing more than this can be said about this external 



35 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



aspect: in common with the journalist, the party official bears the 
odium of being declasse. 'Wage writer' or 'wage speaker' will unfor- 
tunately always resound in his ears, even though the words remain 
unexpressed. He who is inwardly defenseless and unable to find the 
proper answer for himself had-better stay away from this career. For 
in any case, besides grave temptations, it is an avenue that may con- 
stantly lead to disappointments. Now r then, what inner enjoyments 
can this career offer and what personal conditions are presupposed 
for one who enters this avenue? 

Well, first of all the career of politics grants a feeling of power. 
The knowledge of influencing men, of participating in power over 
them, and above all, the feeling of holding in one's hands a nerve 
fiber of historically important events can elevate the professional 
politician above everyday routine even when he is placed in formally 
modest positions. But now the question for him is: Through what 
qualities can I hope to do justice to this power (however narrowly 
circumscribed it may be in the individual case)? How can he hope 
to do justice to the responsibility that power imposes upon him? 
With this we enter the field of ethical questions, for that is where the 
problem belongs: What kind of a man must one be if he is to be 
allowed to put his hand on the wheel of history? 

One can say that three pre-eminent qualities are decisive for the 
politician: passion, a feeling of responsibility, and a sense of propor- 
tion. 

This means passion in the sense of matter-of-factness, of passio- 
nate devotion to a 'cause,' to tire god or demon who is its overlord. 
It is not passion in the sense of that inner bearing which my late 
friend, Georg Simmel, used to designate as 'sterile excitation,' and 
which was peculiar especially to a certain type of Russian intellectual 
(by no means all of them!). It is an excitation that plays so great a 
part with our intellectuals in this carnival we decorate with the proud 
name of 'revolution.' It is a 'romanticism of the intellectually inter- 
esting,' running into emptiness devoid of all feeling of objective re- 
sponsibility. 

To be sure, mere passion, however genuinely felt, is not enough. 
It does not make a politician, unless passion as devotion to a 'cause' 
also makes responsibility to this cause the guiding star of action. 
And for this, a sense of proportion is needed. This is tire decisive 
psychological quality of tire politician: his ability to let realities work 
upon him with inner concentration and calmness. Hence his dis- 
tance to things and men. 'Lack of distance' per se is one of tire dead- 
ly sins of every politician. It is one of those qualities tire breeding of 
which will condemn tire progeny of our intellectuals to political in- 
capacity. For tire problem is simply how can warm passion and a 
cool sense of proportion be forged together in one and tire same 
soul? Politics is made with tire head, not with other parts of the body 
or soul. And yet devotion to politics, if it is not to be frivolous intel- 



36 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



lectual play but rather genuinely human conduct, can be born and 
nourished from passion alone. However, that firm taming of the 
soul, which distinguishes die passionate politician and differentiates 
him from the 'sterilely excited' and mere political dilettante, is poss- 
ible only dirough habituation to detachment in every sense of die 
word. The 'strength' of a political 'personality' means, in die first 
place, die possession of these qualities of passion, responsibility, and 
proportion. 

Therefore, daily and hourly, the politician inwardly has to over- 
come a quite trivial and all-too-human enemy: a quite vulgar vanity, 
the deadly enemy of all matter-of-fact devotion to a cause, and of all 
distance, in diis case, of distance towards one's self. 

Vanity is a very widespread quality and perhaps nobody is en- 
tirely free from it. In academic and scholarly circles, vanity is a sort 
of occupational disease, but precisely widi die scholar, vanity— 
however disagreeably it may express itself— is relatively harmless; in 
the sense that as a rule it does not disturb scientific enterprise. Widi 
die politician die case is quite different. He works widi die striving 
for power as an unavoidable means. Therefore, 'power instinct,' as 
is usually said, belongs indeed to his normal qualities. The sin 
against die lofty spirit of his vocation, however, begins where diis 
striving for power ceases to be objective and becomes purely per- 
sonal self-intoxication, instead of exclusively entering the serv ice of 
'die cause.' For ultimately diere are only two kinds of deadly sins in 
the field of politics: lack of objectivity and— often but not always 
identical with it— irresponsibility. Vanity, die need personally to 
stand in die foreground as clearly as possible, strongly tempts die 
politician to commit one or both of diese sins. This is more truly the 
case as the demagogue is compelled to count upon 'effect.' He 
dierefore is constandy in danger of becoming an actor as well as tak- 
ing lightiy die responsibility for die outcome of his actions and of 
being concerned merely widi die 'impression' he makes. His lack of 
objectivity tempts him to strive for the glamorous semblance of 
power radier dian for actual pow r er. His irresponsibility, however, 
suggests diat he enjoy power merely for power's sake without a subs- 
tantive purpose. Altiiough, or radier just because, power is the un- 
avoidable means, and striving for power is one of the driving forces 
of all politics, diere is no more harmful distortion of political force 
dian die parvenu-like braggart widi power, and die vain self- 
reflection in die feeling of pow r er, and in general every worship of 
power per se. The mere 'power politician' may get strong effects, 
but actually his work leads nowiiere and is senseless. (Among us, 
too, an ardendy promoted cult seeks to glorify him.) In this, the crit- 
ics of 'power politics' are absolutely right. From die sudden inner 
collapse of typical representatives of diis mentality, we can see what 
inner weakness and impotence hides behind diis boastful but en- 
tirely empty gesture. It is a product of a shoddy and superficially 



37 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



blase attitude towards die meaning of human conduct; and it has no 
relation whatsoever to the knowledge of tragedy with which all ac- 
tion, but especially political action, is truly interwoven. 

The final result of political action often, no, even regularly, 
stands in completely inadequate and often even paradoxical relation 
to its original meaning. This is fundamental to all history, a point not 
to be proved in detail here. But because of this fact, the serving of a 
cause must not be absent if action is to have inner strength. Exactly 
what the cause, in the service of which the politician strives for pow- 
er and uses power, looks like is a matter of faith. The politician may 
serve national, humanitarian, social, ethical, cultural, worldly, or re- 
ligious ends. The politician may be sustained by a strong belief in 
'progress'— no matter in which sense— or he may coolly reject this 
kind of belief. He may claim to stand in the sendee of an 'idea' or, 
rejecting this in principle, he may want to serve external ends of eve- 
ryday life. However, some kind of faith must always exist. Other- 
wise, it is absolutely true that the curse of the creature's worthless- 
ness overshadows even the externally strongest political successes. 

With the statement above we are already engaged in discussing 
the last problem that concerns us tonight: the ethos of politics as a 
'cause.' What calling can politics fulfil quite independently of its 
goals within the total ethical economy of human conduct— which is, 
so to speak, the ethical locus where politics is at home? Here, to be 
sure, ultimate Weltanschauungen clash, world views among which in 
the end one has to make a choice. Let us resolutely tackle this prob- 
lem, which recently has been opened again, in my view in a very 
wrong way. 

But first, let us free ourselves from a quite trivial falsification: 
namely, that ethics may first appear in a morally highly compro- 
mised role. Let us consider examples. Rarely will you find that a 
man whose love turns from one woman to another feels no need to 
legitimate this before himself by saying: she was not worthy of my 
love, or, she has disappointed me, or whatever other like 'reasons' 
exist. This is an attitude that, with a profound lack of chivalry, adds a 
fancied 'legitimacy' to the plain fact that he no longer loves her and 
that die woman has to bear it. By virtue of this 'legitimation,' the 
man claims a right for himself and besides causing die misfortune 
seeks to put her in the wrong. The successful amatory competitor 
proceeds exactly in die same way: namely, die opponent must be 
less worthy, otherwise he would not have lost out. It is no different, 
of course, if after a victorious war the victor in undignified self- 
righteousness claims, 'I have won because I was right.' Or, if some- 
body under the frightfulness of war collapses psychologically, and 
instead of simply saying it was just too much, he feels die need of 
legitimizing his war weariness to himself by substituting die feeling, 'I 
could not bear it because I had to fight for a morally bad cause.' 
And likewise with die defeated in war. Instead of searching like old 



38 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



women for die 'guilty one' after the war— in a situation in which tire 
structure of society produced die war— everyone widi a manly and 
controlled attitude would tell die enemy, 'We lost the war. You have 
won it. That is now all over. Now let us discuss what conclusions 
must he drawn according to die objective interests tiiat came into 
play and what is die main tiling in view of the responsibility towards 
the future which above all hurdens the victor.' Anything else is un- 
dignified and will become a boomerang. A nation forgives if its in- 
terests have been damaged, but no nation forgives if its honor has 
been offended, especially hy a bigoted self-righteousness. Every new 
document that conies to light after decades revives the undignified 
lamentations, the hatred and scorn, instead of allowing die war at its 
end to be huried, at least morally. This is possible only through ob- 
jectivity and chivalry and above all only through dignity. But never is 
it possible through an 'ethic,' which in truth signifies a lack of dignity 
on both sides. Instead of being concerned about what die politician 
is interested in, die future and die responsibility towards die future, 
this ethic is concerned ahout politically sterile questions of past guilt, 
which are not to be settled politically. To act in this way is politically 
guilty, if such guilt exists at all. And it overlooks the unavoidable fal- 
sification of the whole problem, through very material interests: 
namely, the victor's interest in die greatest possible moral and ma- 
terial gain; die hopes of die defeated to trade in advantages through 
confessions of guilt. If anything is 'vulgar,' then, this is, and it is the 
result of this fashion of exploiting 'ethics' as a means of 'being in the 
right.' 

Now then, what relations do ethics and politics actually have? 
Have the two nothing whatever to do with one another, as has occa- 
sionally been said? Or, is die reverse true: that the ethic of political 
conduct is identical with that of any other conduct? Occasionally an 
exclusive choice has been believed to exist between die two proposi- 
tions— either the one or the other proposition must he correct. But is 
it true that any ethic of the world could establish commandments of 
identical content for erotic, business, familial, and official relations; 
for the relations to one's wife, to the greengrocer, the son, the com- 
petitor, the friend, die defendant? Should it really matter so little for 
the ethical demands on politics that politics operates with very spe- 
cial means, namely, power backed up hy violence? Do we not see 
that the Bolshevik and die Spartacist ideologists bring ahout exactly 
the same results as any militaristic dictator just hecause they use this 
political means? In what but the persons of the power-holders and 
their dilettantism does the rule of the workers' and soldiers' councils 
differ from die rule of any power-holder of die old regime? In what 
way does the polemic of most representatives of the presumably 
new ethic differ from that of the opponents which they criticized, or 
the ethic of any other demagogues? In their noble intention, people 
will say, Good! But it is the means about which we speak here, and 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



die adversaries, in complete subjective sincerity, claim, in the very 
same way, diat dieir ultimate intentions are of lofty character. 'All 
diey drat take the sword shall perish widi die sword' and fighting is 
everywhere fighting. Hence, the ediic of die Sermon on die Mount. 

By die Sermon on die Mount, we mean the absolute ethic of die 
gospel, which is a more serious matter dian those who are fond of 
quoting diese commandments today believe. This ethic is no joking 
matter. The same holds for diis ediic as has been said of causality in 
science: it is not a cab, which one can have stopped at one's plea- 
sure; it is all or nothing. This is precisely die meaning of die gospel, 
if trivialities are not to result. Hence, for instance, it was said of the 
wealthy young man, 'He went away sorrowful: for he had great pos- 
sessions.' The evangelist commandment, however, is unconditional 
and unambiguous: give what diou hast— absolutely everydiing. The 
politician will say diat diis is a socially senseless imposition as long as 
it is not carried out everywhere. Thus the politician upholds taxa- 
tion, confiscatory taxation, outright confiscation; in a word, compul- 
sion and regulation for all. The ediical commandment, however, is 
not at all concerned about diat, and diis unconcern is its essence. 
Or, take die example, 'turn die odier cheek:' This command is un- 
conditional and does not question die source of die odier's authority 
to strike. Except for a saint it is an ediic of indignity. This is it: one 
must be saindy in everything; at least in intention, one must live like 
Jesus, die aposties, St. Francis, and dieir like. Then diis ediic makes 
sense and expresses a kind of dignity; otherwise it does not. For if it 
is said, in line with die acosmic ediic of love, 'Resist not him diat is 
evil widi force,' for the politician die reverse proposition holds, 
'diou shalt resist evil by force,' or else you are responsible for the 
evil winning out. He who wishes to follow the ethic of die gospel 
should abstain from strikes, for strikes mean compulsion; he may 
join die company unions. Above all tilings, he should not talk of 
'revolution.' After all, die ediic of die gospel does not wish to teach 
diat civil war is the only legitimate war. The pacifist who follows the 
gospel will refuse to bear arms or will dirow diem down; in Germa- 
ny this was the recommended ediical duty to end die war and die- 
rewitii all wars. The politician would say the only sure means to dis- 
credit die war for all foreseeable time would have been a status quo 
peace. Then the nations would have questioned, what was diis war 
for? And dien die war would have been argued ad absurdum, which 
is now impossible. For die victors, at least for part of them, the war 
will have been politically profitable. And die responsibility for diis 
rests on behavior diat made all resistance impossible for us. Now, as 
a result of the ethics of absolutism, when die period of exhaustion 
will have passed, the peace will be discredited, not the war. 

Finally, let us consider die duty of trudifulness. For die absolute 
ediic it holds unconditionally. Hence die conclusion was reached to 
publish all documents, especially diose placing blame on one's own 



40 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



country. On the basis of these one-sided publications the confes- 
sions of guilt followed— and they were one-sided, unconditional, and 
without regard to consequences. The politician will find that as a 
result truth will not be furthered but certainly obscured dirough 
abuse and unleashing of passion; only an all-round methodical in- 
vestigation by non-partisans could bear fruit; any other procedure 
may have consequences for a nation that cannot be remedied for 
decades. But the absolute ethic just does not ask for 'consequences.' 
That is the decisive point. 

We must be clear about the fact that all ethically oriented con- 
duct may be guided by one of two fundamentally differing and irre- 
concilably opposed maxims: conduct can be oriented to an 'ethic of 
ultimate ends' or to an 'ethic of responsibility.' This is not to say that 
an ethic of ultimate ends is identical with irresponsibility, or that an 
ethic of responsibility is identical with unprincipled opportunism. 
Naturally nobody says that. However, there is an abysmal contrast 
between conduct that follows the maxim of an ethic of ultimate 
ends— that is, in religious terms, 'The Christian does rightly and 
leaves the results with the Lord'— and conduct that follows the max- 
im of an ethic of responsibility, in which case one has to give an ac- 
count of the foreseeable results of one's action. 

You may demonstrate to a convinced syndicalist, believing in an 
ethic of ultimate ends, that his action will result in increasing the op- 
portunities of reaction, in increasing the oppression of his class, and 
obstructing its ascent— and you will not make the slightest impression 
upon him. If an action of good intent leads to bad results, then, in 
the actor's eyes, not he but the world, or the stupidity of other men, 
or God's will who made them thus, is responsible for the evil. How- 
ever a man who believes in an ethic of responsibility takes account 
of precisely the average deficiencies of people; as Fichte has correct- 
ly said, he does not even have the right to presuppose their good- 
ness and perfection. He does not feel in a position to burden others 
with the results of his own actions so far as he was able to foresee 
them; he will say: these results are ascribed to my action. The be- 
liever in an ethic of ultimate ends feels 'responsible' only for seeing 
to it that the flame of pure intentions is not quelched: for example, 
the flame of protesting against the injustice of the social order. To 
rekindle the flame ever anew is the purpose of his quite irrational 
deeds, judged in view of their possible success. They are acts that 
can and shall have only exemplary value. 

But even herewith the problem is not yet exhausted. No ethics 
in the world can dodge the fact that in numerous instances the at- 
tainment of 'good' ends is bound to the fact that one must be willing 
to pay the price of using morally dubious means or at least danger- 
ous ones— and facing the possibility or even the probability of evil 
ramifications. From no ethics in the world can it be concluded when 
and to what extent the ethically good purpose 'justifies' the ethically 



41 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



dangerous means and ramifications. 

The decisive means for politics is violence. You may see the ex- 
tent of die tension between means and ends, when viewed ethically, 
from die following: as is generally known, even during the war the 
revolutionary socialists (Zimmerwald faction) professed a principle 
diat one might strikingly formulate: 'If we face die choice either of 
some more years of war and then revolution, or peace now and no 
revolution, we choose— some more years of war!' Upon the further 
question: 'What can this revolution bring about?' every scientifically 
trained socialist would have had die answer: One cannot speak of a 
transition to an economy that in our sense could be called socialist; a 
bourgeois economy will re -emerge, merely stripped of the feudal 
elements and die dynastic vestiges. For this very modest result, they 
are willing to face 'some more years of war.' One may well say diat 
even with a very robust socialist conviction one might reject a pur- 
pose that demands such means. Widi Bolshevism and Spartacism, 
and, in general, with any kind of revolutionary socialism, it is pre- 
cisely die same tiling. It is of course utterly ridiculous if die power 
politicians of die old regime are morally denounced for dieir use of 
die same means, however justified die rejection of their aims may 
be. 

The ediic of ultimate ends apparently must go to pieces on die 
problem of die justification of means by ends. As a matter of fact, 
logically it has only the possibility of rejecting all action that employs 
morally dangerous means— in theory! In the world of realities, as a 
rule, we encounter die ever-renewed experience diat die adherent of 
an ediic of ultimate ends suddenly turns into a chiliastic prophet. 
Those, for example, who have just preached 'love against violence' 
now call for die use of force for the last violent deed, which would 
dien lead to a state of affairs in which all violence is annihilated. In 
die same manner, our officers told die soldiers before every offen- 
sive: 'This will be die last one; this one will bring victory and there- 
with peace.' The proponent of an ediic of absolute ends cannot 
stand up under die ediical irrationality of die world. He is a cosmic- 
ediical 'rationalist.' Those of you who know Dostoievski will re- 
member die scene of die 'Grand Inquisitor,' where die problem is 
poignandy unfolded. If one makes any concessions at all to die prin- 
ciple that the end justifies die means, it is not possible to bring an 
ediic of ultimate ends and an ediic of responsibility under one roof 
or to decree etiiically which end should justify which means. 

My colleague, Mr. F. W. Forster, whom personally I highly es- 
teem for his undoubted sincerity, but whom I reject unreservedly as 
a politician, believes it is possible to get around this difficulty by the 
simple diesis: 'from good conies only good; but from evil only evil 
follows.' In diat case this whole complex of questions would not ex- 
ist. But it is radier astonishing diat such a thesis could come to light 
two thousand five hundred years after die Upanishads. Not only die 



42 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



whole course of world history, hut ever}' frank examination of eve- 
ryday experience points to the very opposite. The development of 
religions all over the world is determined hy the fact that the oppo- 
site is true. The age-old prohlem of theodicy consists of the very 
question of how it is that a power which is said to he at once omni- 
potent and kind could have created such an irrational world of un- 
deserved suffering, unpunished injustice, and hopeless stupidity. Ei- 
ther this power is not omnipotent or not kind, or, entirely different 
principles of compensation and reward govern our life— principles 
we may interpret metaphysically, or even principles that forever es- 
cape our comprehension. 

This prohlem— the experience of the irrationality of the world- 
has heen the driving force of all religious evolution. The Indian doc- 
trine of karma, Persian dualism, the doctrine of original sin, predes- 
tination and die deus absconditus, all these have grown out of this 
experience. Also the early Christians knew full well the world is go- 
verned by demons and that he who lets himself in for politics, that 
is, for power and force as means, contracts with diabolical powers 
and for his action it is not true that good can follow only from good 
and evil only from evil, but that often the opposite is true. Anyone 
who fails to see this is, indeed, a political infant. 

We are placed into various life -spheres, each of which is go- 
verned by different laws. Religious ethics have settled with this fact 
in different ways. Hellenic polytheism made sacrifices to Aphrodite 
and Hera alike, to Dionysus and to Apollo, and knew these gods 
were frequently in conflict with one another. The Hindu order of 
life made each of the different occupations an object of a specific 
ethical code, a Dharma, and forever segregated one from the other 
as castes, thereby placing them into a fixed hierarchy of rank. For 
the man born into it, there was no escape from it, lest he be twice- 
born in another life. The occupations were thus placed at varying 
distances from tire highest religious goods of salvation. In this way, 
the caste order allowed for the possibility of fashioning tire Dharma 
of each single caste, from those of tire ascetics and Brahmins to 
those of the rogues and harlots, in accordance with tire immanent 
and autonomous laws of their respective occupations. War and poli- 
tics were also included. You will find war integrated into tire totality 
of life-spheres in tire Bhagavad-Gita, in tire conversation between 
Krishna and Arduna. 'Do what must be done,' i.e. do that work 
which, according to tire Dharma of tire warrior caste and its rules, is 
obligator}? and which, according to tire purpose of tire war, is objec- 
tively necessary. Hinduism believes that such conduct does not 
damage religious salvation but, rather, promotes it. When he faced 
tire hero's death, tire Indian warrior was always sure of Indra's hea- 
ven, just as was the Teuton warrior of Valhalla. The Indian hero 
would have despised Nirvana just as much as the Teuton would 
have sneered at the Christian paradise with its angels' choirs. This 



43 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



specialization of ethics allowed for the Indian ethic's quite unbroken 
treatment of politics by following politics' own laws and even radical- 
ly enhancing this royal art. 

A really radical 'Machiavellianism,' in the popular sense of this 
word, is classically represented in Indian literature, in the Kautaliya 
Arthasastra (long before Christ, allegedly dating from Chandragup- 
ta's time). In contrast with this document Machiavelli's Principe is 
harmless. As is known in Catholic ethics— to which otherwise Profes- 
sor Forster stands close— the consilia evangelica are a special ethic 
for those endowed with the charisma of a holy life. There stands the 
monk who must not shed blood or strive for gain, and beside him 
stand the pious knight and the burgher, who are allowed to do so, 
the one to shed blood, the other to pursue gain. The gradation of 
ethics and its organic integration into the doctrine of salvation is less 
consistent than in India. According to the presuppositions of Chris- 
tian faith, this could and had to be the case. The wickedness of the 
world stemming from original sin allowed with relative ease the inte- 
gration of violence into ethics as a disciplinary means against sin and 
against the heretics who endangered the soul. However, the de- 
mands of the Sermon on the Mount, an acosmic ethic of ultimate 
ends, implied a natural law of absolute imperatives based upon reli- 
gion. These absolute imperatives retained their revolutionizing force 
and they came upon the scene with elemental vigor during almost all 
periods of social upheaval. They produced especially the radical pa- 
cifist sects, one of which in Pennsylvania experimented in establish- 
ing a polity that renounced violence towards the outside. This expe- 
riment took a tragic course, inasmuch as with the outbreak of the 
War of Independence the Quakers could not stand up arms-in- 
hand for their ideals, which were those of the war. 

Normally, Protestantism, however, absolutely legitimated the 
state as a divine institution and hence violence as a means. Protes- 
tantism, especially, legitimated the authoritarian state. Luther re- 
lieved the individual of the ethical responsibility for war and trans- 
ferred it to the authorities. To obey the authorities in matters other 
than those of faith could never constitute guilt. Calvinism in turn 
knew principled violence as a means of defending the faith; thus 
Calvinism knew the crusade, which was for Islam an element of life 
from the beginning. One sees that it is by no means a modern disbe- 
lief born from the hero worship of the Renaissance which poses the 
problem of political ethics. All religions have wrestled with it, with 
highly differing success, and after what has been said it could not be 
otherwise. It is the specific means of legitimate violence as such in 
the hand of human associations which determines the peculiarity of 
all ethical problems of politics. 

Whosoever contracts with violent means for whatever ends— and 
every politician does— is exposed to its specific consequences. This 
holds especially for the crusader, religious and revolutionary alike. 



44 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



Let us confidently take the present as an example. He who wants to 
establish absolute justice on earth by force requires a following, a 
human 'machine.' He must hold out the necessary internal and ex- 
ternal premiums, heavenly or worldly reward, to this 'machine' or 
else the machine will not function. Under the conditions of the 
modern class struggle, the internal premiums consist of the satisfying 
of hatred and the craving for revenge; above all, resentment and the 
need for pseudo-ethical self-righteousness: the opponents must be 
slandered and accused of heresy. The external rewards are adven- 
ture, victory, booty, power, and spoils. The leader and his success 
are completely dependent upon the functioning of his machine and 
hence not on his own motives. Therefore he also depends upon 
whether or not the premiums can be permanently granted to the 
following, that is, to the Red Guard, the informers, the agitators, 
whom he needs. What he actually attains under the conditions of 
his work is therefore not in his hand, but is prescribed to him by the 
following' s motives, which, if viewed ethically, are predominantly 
base. The following can be harnessed only so long as an honest be- 
lief in his person and his cause inspires at least part of the following, 
probably never on earth even the majority. This belief, even when 
subjectively sincere, is in a very great number of cases really no 
more than an ethical 'legitimation' of cravings for revenge, power, 
booty, and spoils. We shall not be deceived about this by verbiage; 
the materialist interpretation of history is no cab to be taken at will; 
it does not stop short of the promoters of revolutions. Emotional 
revolutionism is followed by the traditionalist routine of everyday 
life; the crusading leader and tire faith itself fade away, or, what is 
even more effective, tire faith becomes part of tire conventional 
phraseology of political Philistines and banausic technicians. This 
development is especially rapid with struggles of faith because they 
are usually led or inspired by genuine leaders, that is, prophets of 
revolution. For here, as with every leader's machine, one of tire 
conditions for success is tire depersonalization and routinization, in 
short, tire psychic proletarianization, in tire interests of discipline. 
After coming to power tire following of a crusader usually degene- 
rates very easily into a quite common stratum of spoilsmen. 

Whoever wants to engage in politics at all, and especially in poli- 
tics as a vocation, has to realize these ethical paradoxes. He must 
know that he is responsible for what may become of himself under 
tire impact of these paradoxes. I repeat, he lets himself in for the 
diabolic forces lurking in all violence. The great virtuosi of acosmic 
love of humanity and goodness, whether stemming from Nazareth 
or Assisi or from Indian royal castles, have not operated with the 
political means of violence. Their kingdom was 'not of this world' 
and yet they worked and still work in this world. The figures of Pla- 
ton Karatajev and the saints of Dostoievski still remain their most 
adequate reconstructions. He who seeks the salvation of the soul, of 



45 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



his own and of others, should not seek it along the avenue of poli- 
tics, for the quite different tasks of politics can only he solved by vi- 
olence. The genius or demon of politics lives in an inner tension 
with the god of love, as well as with the Christian God as expressed 
by die church. This tension can at any time lead to an irreconcilable 
conflict. Men knew this even in the times of church rule. Time and 
again the papal interdict was placed upon Florence and at the time it 
meant a far more robust power for men and their salvation of soul 
than (to speak with Fichte) the 'cool approbation' of the Kantian 
ethical judgment. The burghers, however, fought the church-state. 
And it is with reference to such situations that Machiavelli in a beau- 
tiful passage, if I am not mistaken, of the History of Florence, has 
one of his heroes praise those citizens who deemed the greatness of 
their native city higher than the salvation of their souls. 

If one says 'the future of socialism' or 'international peace,' in- 
stead of native city or 'fatherland' (which at present may be a du- 
bious value to some), then you face the problem as it stands now. 
Everything that is striven for through political action operating with 
violent means and following an ethic of responsibility endangers the 
'salvation of the soul.' If, however, one chases after the ultimate 
good in a war of beliefs, following a pure ethic of absolute ends, 
then the goals may be damaged and discredited for generations, be- 
cause responsibility for consequences is lacking, and two diabolic 
forces which enter the play remain unknown to the actor. These are 
inexorable and produce consequences for his action and even for 
his inner self, to which he must helplessly submit, unless he perce- 
ives them. The sentence: 'The devil is old; grow old to understand 
him!' does not refer to age in terms of chronological years. I have 
never permitted myself to lose out in a discussion through a refer- 
ence to a date registered on a birth certificate; but tire mere fact that 
someone is twenty years of age and that I am over fifty is no cause 
for me to think that this alone is air achievement before which I am 
overawed. Age is not decisive; what is decisive is the trained relen- 
tlessness in viewing tire realities of life, and tire ability to face such 
realities and to measure up to them inwardly. 

Surely, politics is made with the head, but it is certainly not 
made with tire head alone. In this tire proponents of an ethic of ul- 
timate ends are right. One cannot prescribe to anyone whether he 
should follow an ethic of absolute ends or an ethic of responsibility, 
or when tire one and when tire other. One can say only this much: If 
in these times, which, in your opinion, are not times of 'sterile' exci- 
tation—excitation is not, after all, genuine passion— if now suddenly 
tire Weltanschauungs-politicmns crop up en masse and pass tire 
watchword, 'The world is stupid and base, not I,' 'The responsibility 
for the consequences does not fall upon me but upon the others 
whom I serve and whose stupidity or baseness I shall eradicate,' 
then I declare frankly that I would first inquire into the degree of 



46 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



inner poise backing this ethic of ultimate ends. I am under tire im- 
pression that in nine out of ten cases I deal with windbags who do 
not fully realize what diey take upon diemselves but who intoxicate 
diemselves widi romantic sensations. From a human point of view 
this is not very interesting to me, nor does it move me profoundly. 
However, it is immensely moving when a mature man— no matter 
whether old or young in years— is aware of a responsibility for the 
consequences of his conduct and really feels such responsibility with 
heart and soul. He then acts by following an ediic of responsibility 
and somewhere he reaches die point where he says: 'Here I stand; I 
can do no odier.' That is sometiiing genuinely human and moving. 
And every one of us who is not spiritually dead must realize die pos- 
sibility of finding himself at some time in diat position. In so far as 
diis is true, an ediic of ultimate ends and an ediic of responsibility 
are not absolute contrasts but radier supplements, which only in un- 
ison constitute a genuine man— a man who can have die 'calling for 
politics.' 

Now dien, ladies and gendemen, let us debate this matter once 
more ten years from now. Unfortunately, for a whole series of rea- 
sons, I fear diat by dien die period of reaction will have long since 
broken over us. It is very probable that little of what many of you, 
and (I candidly confess) I too, have wished and hoped for will be 
fulfilled; little— perhaps not exactly nothing, but what to us at least 
seems little. This will not crush me, but surely it is an inner burden 
to realize it. Then, I wish I could see what has become of diose of 
you who now feel yourselves to be genuinely 'principled' politicians 
and who share in die intoxication signified by diis revolution. It 
would be nice if matters turned out in such a way diat Shakespeare's 
Sonnet 102 should hold true: 

Our love was new, and dien but in die spring, 
When I was wont to greet it widi my lays; 
As Philomel in summer's front doth sing, 
And stops her pipe in growth of riper days. 

But such is not the case. Not summer's bloom lies ahead of us, but 
radier a polar night of icy darkness and hardness, no matter which 
group may triumph externally now. Where diere is nodiing, not on- 
ly die Kaiser but also the proletarian has lost his rights. When diis 
night shall have slowly receded, who of diose for whom spring ap- 
parently has bloomed so luxuriously will be alive? And what will 
have become of all of you by then? Will you be bitter or banausic? 
Will you simply and dully accept world and occupation? Or will the 
tiiird and by no means die least frequent possibility be your lot: mys- 
tic flight from reality for diose who are gifted for it, or— as is both 
frequent and unpleasant— for diose who belabor diemselves to fol- 
low diis fashion? In every one of such cases, I shall draw die conclu- 
sion diat diey have not measured up to dieir own doings. They have 



47 



POLITICS AS A VOCATION 



not measured up to the world as it really is in its everyday routine. 
Objectively and actually, they have not experienced the vocation for 
politics in its deepest meaning, which they diought they had. They 
would have done better in simply cultivating plain brotherliness in 
personal relations. And for the rest— they should have gone soberly 
about their daily work. 

Politics is a strong and slow boring of hard boards. It takes both 
passion and perspective. Certainly all historical experience confirms 
the truth— that man would not have attained the possible unless time 
and again he had reached out for the impossible. But to do that a 
man must be a leader, and not only a leader but a hero as well, in a 
very sober sense of the word. And even those who are neither lead- 
ers nor heroes must arm themselves with that steadfastness of heart 
which can brave even the crumbling of all hopes. This is necessary 
right now, or else men will not be able to attain even that which is 
possible today. Only he has the calling for politics who is sure that 
he shall not crumble when the world from his point of view is too 
stupid or too base for what he wants to offer. Only he who in the 
face of all this can say 'In spite of all!' has the calling for politics. 

NOTES 

1 Trachtet nach seinem Werk. 

2 A high ministerial official in charge of a special division concerning which 
he had to give regular reports. 

3 Head of an administrative division in a ministry. 
4 The 'local agents' of die party. 

s Weher alludes to the evasion of rationing and priority rules and the develop- 
ments of 'black markets' during die wartime administration of Germany, 1914 to 
1918. 

^Federal Council. 

' 1 Landwirtschaftskammer. 

8 Handwerkskammer. 



48 



